The goods cost less than 20 euros.
The fee is equal to 40% of the value of the goods...
I'm a #PRS_ORG# big customer so it's not a problem for me.
All I need is a number or instructions on what I should include with the package so that it can be tracked by you as a return.
I ordered the #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for 249€.
Today, it costs 179€.
To be honest, I find that very annoying.
Do I have to cancel the order and re-order for the better price or is there another way of getting a credit?
In general, I also think that children should not be expected to take on the parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I think it is also good for older siblings to take care of the little ones in moderation.
A quick look, a quick help, bring the bottle, etc.
In this way, they learn responsibility, help in the family, and are involved.
As long as they can still be children themselves, I see no problem with that.
If your K1 is occupied for a short time alone and it's OK for him, that's good.
You can best determine whether this is suitable for your children.
It's not as if he's supposed to wrap K2 and accompany him for hours while he falls asleep.
From a legal perspective, it is probably questionable.
Perhaps that is why the psychologist made the statement.
Because if something actually happens like a fire, a break-in, an earthquake, an alien invasion, etc., it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to take care of K2.
Whether this is a risk you want to take, of course, is up to you ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and although I can still remember most of the plot, I can't remember the title. Maybe someone here knows...
The story was about fear and how to deal with it.
At the start of the story a zookeeper commits suicide by dousing himself in food and going into the enclosure with his big cats.
The case is taken over by a policewoman who, after a short investigation, ends up at his therapist, who runs a clinic where he treats patients with anxiety.
The commissioner has a young niece who also has a fear (of fire) and ends up at this therapist.
There are more suicides and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is anonymously commissioned before each suicide to go to the scene of the suicide and document it and post the photos on the internet.
At any rate, it turns out that this therapist is running a kind of underground therapy group, where the patients are implanted with a chip that suppresses a fear center in the brain, and the patients end up facing their fears in the most extreme way possible.
(A woman jumps out of a window, another drives herself to death on purpose)
This facing of fear is referred to as "the fight" in the book.
In the end, there's a big showdown in the clinic that had to do with a fire.
This is the rough plot, I am pretty sure that the book was originally written by a French author/author.
If this action is familiar to anyone, or even if someone can tell me the title of the book, I would be very happy.
Oh no, I don't have the password for the Wi-Fi.
I'll have to contact my husband first.
But this can take a long time.
What steps do I need to take afterwards?
Is it also possible to get the price difference refunded?
A 4-year-old child, splinter under the thumbnail
Kind, four years old, has wood splinters over the entire length under the thumb nail (outside).
They tried to pull him out with a pair of tweezers.
Very difficult to grasp.
It didn't work and it hurt.
Now the child is hysterical when we try.
No chance.
Tomorrow I will go to the doctor.
All Bosch power tools, compressed air tools and measuring tools are carefully checked, tested and subject to the strict controls of Bosch quality assurance.
Bosch therefore gives a guarantee for Bosch power tools, air tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's warranty claims from the purchase contract with the seller as well as statutory rights are not restricted by this warranty.
We guarantee these tools according to the following conditions:
We guarantee according to the following regulations (No. 2 – 7) by free correction of defects in the tool, which are proved to be due to a material or manufacturing fault within the guarantee period.
The guarantee period is 24 months, 12 months for commercial or professional use or equivalent use.
The warranty period starts with the purchase by the first end-user.
The date on the original invoice is decisive.
For all commercial blue power tools and measuring tools purchased on or after 01.09.2004 (excluding high frequency tools, industrial battery-powered screwdrivers and pneumatic tools), the warranty period is extended to 36 months if the purchaser registers these tools within 4 weeks of the purchase date.
Battery packs and chargers, as well as included accessories, are excluded from this warranty extension.
Registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
The registration receipt, which must be printed out immediately, and the original purchase receipt, from which the date of purchase can be determined, serve as confirmation.
Registration is only possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of the data they enter there.
Not covered by the guarantee are: Parts subject to normal or other natural wear and tear, and defects in the tool due to normal or other natural use, abnormal environmental conditions, improper operating conditions, overloading or lack of maintenance or care.
Defects in the tool caused by the use of accessories, supplements or replacement parts that are not Bosch original parts.
Tools that have changes or additions made to them.
Minor variations from the specified condition that are insignificant for the value and usability of the tool.
The rectification of the defect acknowledged by us as being covered by the warranty will be carried out in such a way that we will repair the defective tool free of charge or replace it with a tool free of defects (possibly also a successor model).
Replacement tools or parts become our property.
When did the deadline end?
According to the Distance Selling Law, I have a right of withdrawal of 1 month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
With the combination of digital decoder and sound module on one board, we achieve dimensions of only 30mm x 15.5mm and can therefore be installed in almost any H0 and 0 scale locomotives.
LokSound 5 decoders are available with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm large "sugar cube" loudspeaker and a sound capsule kit.
Like all members of the family, the LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
It supports the DCC data format, as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
14 to 128 speed steps in DCC format are as natural as 2- and 4-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus®, the decoders register automatically with a suitable digital central unit.
It supports all DCC programming modes and, thanks to RailCom®, the CV values can be read out on the main track with suitable central units.
For decoders that can only program CVs from 1 to 255, there are auxiliary registers.
Motorola® users benefit from up to 28 channels at 255 addresses.
Three more Motorola addresses allow the triggering of 16 functions.
A built-in programming mode also makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol permits an automatic login to mfx®-compatible central units.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognises Märklin® braking tracks as well as ZIMO® HLU braking commands or the Lenz® ABC system.
It is also possible to brake with DCC brakes or with direct current.
In addition, he also holds a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC pendulum train automatic allows automatic pendulum between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on analogue DC and AC tracks.
Since my voucher has not been extended due to a complaint that did not reach me, I will cancel my order worth approx.
#NUMBER#€ from my shopping cart and order elsewhere, where the customer-friendliness is higher and I don't have to type my fingers off to achieve absolutely nothing!!
What am I supposed to do with this number?
Because of Omicron: Johnson wants to push ahead with booster vaccination
New Omicron cases are causing concern among politicians and scientists in the UK.
Therefore, all adults in England who are eligible are to be offered a vaccination by New Year's Day.
London - British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to move faster with the Covid-19 booster vaccinations in the face of rapidly rising Omikron figures than previously aimed for.
Every adult in England should have the chance to receive a booster dose by the end of the year, if at least three months have passed since their second vaccination, Johnson said in a pre-recorded video message to his fellow countrymen on Sunday evening.
So far, the target date was the end of January.
The UK Government will also provide additional support to accelerate vaccination programmes in the devolved nations of Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
In the face of the Omicron variant, we are facing an emergency, which is why it is urgently necessary to strengthen the vaccination protection, said Johnson.
The good news is that the level of protection can be increased again with a third vaccination dose.
"Get boosted now," Johnson said.
Another 1,239 Omicron cases were recorded in the UK on Sunday, taking the total to 3,137.
Compared with the previous day, this was an increase of a hefty 65 percent. dpa
Will the full amount be refunded from the purchase price if I collect it?
I'm for everyone introducing themselves with pronouns
I sent in an application.
Today, the invitation to a conversation came via email.
I want to respond to the email.
Unfortunately the name is not "Peter", but a somewhat more complicated name.
I Googled it and depending on where they're coming from culturally, it's either a man or a woman.
**I have no idea how to write the email now.
Can somebody please help me?
** I'm a foreigner and I just don't want to step on an official's toes.
Conclusion: everyone should introduce themselves with pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books on it.
4 of them are going.
Only the one I bought today doesn't work
Clearly, the chair had an undisclosed fault at the time of sale.
How can such a cushion damage occur otherwise after 9 months?
First tried on #PRS_ORG#.
However, this has been the case for about.
For no more than 14 days.
Therefore, I have always bought the last books via the website and then read them on the #PRS_ORG#.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# and wanted to buy 8.
But there were none left.
Now they're available again, and I'd like you to please add 2 chairs to the order and bill me.
[CW] The feeling when I can't help.
Content warning: I'm going to write about domestic violence in some detail here.
I just need to get something off my chest.
I (21) come into contact with victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence more often for professional reasons.
A theme that really gnaws at me and unfortunately happens far too often is that many victims do not allow themselves to be helped or think we can't help them.
I am fully aware that we cannot do everything and that it is not perfect.
But there are fewer things in my profession that move me more than when I can't do anything in such situations.
I see the bruises, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in a conversation behind closed doors, with the perpetrator far out of sight and hearing, I cannot reach all of them.
I don't know what the reason is, perhaps it's fear, fear of retaliation, fear of leaving the familiar social environment, fear of taking the children out of it.
What I always want to make clear to everyone, sometimes even very close to tears, is that everyone deserves to be able to live without violence.
I want all women to know that they don't have to just accept violence.
Often I wish I could help in any way... I know I can't.
However, it will never get easier.
Please, always remember that you are worth living without violence, that is so unbelievably important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What is the series about "League of Legends"?
A lot of fantasy, a lot of complicated names, a breathtaking presentation: "Arcane", the series from the "League of Legends" computer game universe, was recently launched on Netflix.
Why are we looking forward to the already announced two seasons?
Basketball-Bundesliga: Derby debacle for the MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg at the Merlins Crailsheim
At least the youngster Johannes Patrick could be relied upon.
Nothing again: For the second time within less than three months, the giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Before the game, Ludwigsburg's coach John Patrick looked back on the cup defeat in early October at the Hakro Merlins Crailsheim and said: "We still have a bit of anger in our bellies".
After the game, however, it did not subside - but rather increased in the wake of the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the Basketball Bundesliga.
More than the bare result, though, it was the manner of the performance that was so disappointing.
As an example, a statistic is mentioned which expresses the entire dilemma: The three-point quota was just 13 percent, 4 hits (all from the young Johannes Patrick) at a whopping 31 attempts - any questions?
John Patrick had the answer: "We weren't focused enough after the win in Tenerife, and didn't execute what we had trained".
That is, to move the ball.
His counterpart Sebastian Gleim reacted quite differently: "A great game to win a second time against Ludwigsburg," said the happy coach.
"It felt like 10,000 people."
Only 750 visitors were allowed into the Hohenlohe Arena on Saturday, but they got their money's worth.
Not least because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who marked 22 points and steered the game of his team.
"The best playmaker I have ever trained," praised Gleim.
While on Patrick's team itself, the top performers like Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) failed across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the Giants prevent a total disaster and came back up to eight points, having already been 39:59 behind.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored 12 points.
Fortunately, there isn't much time to bicker.
Already on Wednesday (7 p.m.) the Giants will host the Skyliners Frankfurt, before then also in Ludwigsburg in front of a maximum of 750 spectators.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I registered a few months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We have sought legal advice again and have therefore written to them again.
We signed up half a year ago.
Always as if hatched from an egg: Max Raabe turns 59
He is able to captivate his audience with new interpretations of hits from the 1920s and 1930s.
He is currently on tour with the programme "Guten Tag, liebes Glück" - if he is allowed to perform.
Max Raabe actually wanted to celebrate his birthday on stage in Leipzig this Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "by order of the authorities", to curb the spread of the coronavirus.
Other concerts he had planned for the Advent season must also be cancelled for the time being, as it says on the website of the singer, who turns 59 today, and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de).
In January, the artists then want to make up for the dates that were postponed due to the pandemic in 2020.
Max Raabe was born on 12 December 1962 in Lünen, North Rhine-Westphalia, and sang a lot as a child.
He studied opera singing in Berlin, and in 1986 founded the Palace Orchestra together with fellow students.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlager and chansons in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
He has won many awards.
His live album from the "MTV Unplugged" series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - second place in the charts.
He made it from the niche to the mainstream.
Always elegantly dressed, with his blonde hair tightly combed back, and attentive to etiquette, Max Raabe is no longer to be found in the current German-speaking music scene.
Since 2020, he has been on tour with the programme "Good morning, dear luck". dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it also possible to get a small sample of the furniture wood in advance?
It can be added to existing furniture and so we can check beforehand if it fits the colour scheme.
It still doesn't work, I can only long for the cover, but I can't turn the pages.
Federal Construction Minister Klara Geywitz: Expropriation does not create a new apartment
The new Federal Minister of Construction Klara Geywitz (SPD) has spoken out against the expropriation of large housing corporations, as demanded in a plebiscite in Berlin.
"No new apartments will be created with expropriation, only the ownership structure will change," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My aim is to give tenants reassurance that their rent will remain affordable in the years to come.
By the way, a colourful mix of, for example, private landlords, cooperatives or housing associations is the best protection against the formation of a monopoly.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party will set up an expert commission to decide how to deal with the result of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not improve, Geywitz did not rule out talks with the FDP in the Ampel coalition about further tightening of the rental law.
The coalition agreement calls for a rent cap until 2029, a limit on rent increases in tight housing markets, and an expansion of the rent index.
I will speak to the Justice Minister to implement this as quickly as possible.
If the rental market does not ease, "we will talk with our coalition partners about further steps", stressed the SPD politician.
Hello, I wanted to place an order and after a few days I realized that I forgot the last step in payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
Do they know when it will be back in stock?
Or whether it will ever come back at all?
#PRS_ORG# with storage space (180 x #NUMBER# cm),
Vouchers sound great
Then I will redeem it on my own for the new order
Thank you for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is shipped in March, how long does the shipping itself take?
I've already cut myself on my finger
That is absolute cheek
At least 100 killed by tornadoes in Kentucky
A devastating storm system has spawned numerous tornadoes across the United States.
There could be more than 100 fatalities in Kentucky alone.
The images from there are reminiscent of a war zone.
In the night to Saturday, several tornadoes in the USA have caused severe destruction and possibly up to 100 fatalities.
The storms have left a 200-mile-long path of destruction, especially in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after a visit to the disaster area that everything was gone where the tornado had ripped through.
Houses, shops, government buildings - just gone.
Parts of industrial facilities, roofs are in the trees.
It is hard to imagine that this is even possible.
He is expecting up to 100 deaths in the state of Kentucky alone, and the official figures are increasing by the hour.
Hi, I just saw that display #NAME# is sold out.
This is very unfortunate.
Is it still being produced?
Or has it been completely removed from the product range?
Is it possible to order this showcase in another country?
When do you report?
If the delivery cannot be made to my home, I must cancel the order!
I understand this, but can I now order the ceiling and have it delivered to Germany, which is in the shopping cart?
I had returned an article or requested a return via the contact form and wanted to ask if it had arrived or was being processed, as I had not yet received a confirmation.
Firms pay vaccine bonuses, change slogans
While the federal government continues to reject proposals for a vaccination bonus, companies in Austria have taken the initiative and are offering their employees financial incentives to get vaccinated.
Thus, they are in line with the social partners ÖGB and the Chamber of Commerce, who today called for financial incentives for vaccination.
The transformation of advertising slogans into vaccination calls - following the German model - is also intended to increase the willingness to be vaccinated against Covid-19.
He has moved to a company that he has gossiped about.
That doesn't make his situation any better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It's been a year.
He hasn't obviously nailed himself to his old place and has been looking for something else.
You can do that, too.
And that he didn't like you back then: well, who cares.
He didn't like his job anyway.
There are too many variables.
Please accept the cancellation.
This will then be legally relevant.
I make a screen-shot.
Hello - I'm interested in the Boone Dining Table, White.
Is there also a large one in 230cm?
We offer all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
Smeg's new coffee machine brings freshly ground coffee to your kitchen or office.
The simple and reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours in combination with the matt brushed stainless steel front make the new SMEG fully automatic coffee machine with milk frother a design object.
In keeping with the reduced design, all functions such as grind setting and water quantity, as well as the choice between espresso, Americano, Ristretto or a mild coffee can be selected with just four buttons.
Thanks to the steam lance, coffee with milk and milk froth specialities can also be prepared.
Help with first own campaign
Cheers to boron!
I am currently running the adventure Over the Griffon's Saddle for a group of 4 friends, and I would like to seamlessly transition my heroes into a campaign written specifically for the players.
We're playing DSA 5.
The big arc is made, the villains and their motivations written, the individual acts thought up, and now I am in the process of writing the introductory adventure and am already stumbling over my own feet at the first encounter.
The premise is that the heroes are to bring a wagon of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near Lake Thuran.
That's where the action is supposed to continue.
A few miles from the village, the hero is said to be ambushed by a group of goblins, who lure him into a trap.
I want to give the player-characters the opportunity to resolve the confrontation in different ways: Persuade, act, threaten, recognize danger early, whatever the players come up with.
Group size: 8 common goblins, 2 armed with spears, 6 armed with bows and sabres
If undetected, the goblins lurk in a hollow way and flank the wagon, three on each side armed with bows, while two stop the wagon with spears.
Should it come to a fight and the heroes lose, I have two solutions
1. The heroes all pass out and are later found and healed by the village schoolmaster's son, a half-elf.
Of course, the cart is gone.
2. If a defeat is inevitable, this half-elf steps in with two of his servants and comes to the hero's aid in battle.
The cart is still there, everything is great.
How do you feel about Deus ex Machina of Solution 2?
Is the encounter too much of an introduction to the adventure?
The group of Goblins will later play a crucial role, so they are not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I'm going to take on board a lot of your ideas and I have more confidence in my narratives now.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again put together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
That is why I would like to send them back anyway
Can you then send me the return tickets, then I can pack the lamp and bring it to the #PRS_ORG#.
Save shipping costs and time - and at the same time relieve the environment!
If you need more than one article, please click "Pay now" once you have all the articles in your shopping cart.
Thus, the combined shipping is automatically calculated and you receive everything in one package.
By doing this, you save yourself the hassle of multiple purchases/payments and the environment will be happy as no unnecessary shipping material and unnecessary fuel for delivering multiple packages will be used.
Faster shipping with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
As a rule, we will send your shipment, if payment has been received by 2:00 p.m., on the same business day.
To ensure that your package arrives as soon as possible, please make sure that your address is complete and that your name is on your mailbox and on your doorbell.
Do you want us to send your package to a parcel machine?
Then please choose DHL, as only DHL is allowed to deliver to DHL parcel stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number, if you have selected DHL or DPD as your carrier.
Thus, you can already check from around 22:00 to see where your package is.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be happy if you would rate us positively and give us five stars in the detail ratings.
Should it ever happen that not everything has gone to your complete satisfaction, we would be grateful if you would get in touch with us before leaving a review.
Only then do we have the chance to do everything we can to make you happy.
We had nothing to do with the chair.
all of a sudden the split was there
I just sat on it
Here, the lower part, i.e. the part with storage space, was damaged.
Will everything be collected again or just the storage space part?
I'm sick of Sky Sports F1
Hello dear F1 fans, over the course of the season, the quality on German Sky has declined more and more, so I want to vent a little with this post.
Firstly, today, in the middle of the F2 race, the broadcast was stopped to start the F1 pre-race coverage on time.
Although the time schedule was far behind the planning due to the delayed start and the start accident, the last (planned) ten minutes as well as the championship decision (!) could still have been shown.
Apparently, however, it is the case that, for legal reasons, F1 takes priority and everything else has to be restricted as a result, so that Sky DE probably had no choice.
Nevertheless, it was stupid, especially since Sky UK transmitted the race to its end.
Nevertheless, a little praise: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes has accompanied the difficult situation around the serious accident well.
Then there was once again rule ignorance among the commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher, as both of them did not know that tyres can be changed under a red flag.
Although this situation had already occurred in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, both only came to the conclusion that Verstappen was allowed to change tyres when there were corresponding radio messages on this topic to Hamilton.
At Sky UK and RTL, both commentators knew straight away that Verstappen had this opportunity.
I believe that such elementary rules should simply be known if you comment on F1 at a pay-TV channel.
It's also not the first time that guesswork as to what's allowed or required by the rules is now possible or required, both have simply constant uncertainty about the rules.
In general, I don't like the artificial commentary style of Roos, but I admit that this is a matter of taste.
But I actually like Heiko Wasser from RTL better.
In addition, there are constant jokes that make both of them appear simply unprofessional, such as ordering coffee from the (equally clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
The latter in particular causes a lot of unrest in the comment, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least, the advertising is getting out of hand at Sky, in the final round, Sky is the only channel that goes into advertising, as one can hear on F1TV, where only the German sound track without commentary has to suffice directly after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor ORF do this.
These two channels also make less advertising in the training than Sky, and that as a free-to-air channel.
Although one must praise Glock and Baumgartner for their work, that alone does not make me overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of the Sky Sports F1 schedule is also very poor and full of repeats.
Overall, Sky is really the worst German-language station that broadcasts the F1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job with the four races that they are still allowed to broadcast.
This makes the fantastic F1 season a lot less fun than it would be with a reasonable broadcaster.
I'd like to hear your opinion.
Here: #PRS_ORG#-pendant light, brass and multi-coloured glass x 1
Hi, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and still hasn't been delivered.
I've contacted the chat twice and so far nothing.
The First Lady told me it was going to go out on Monday, the Second Lady told me yesterday that she was going to check and send an email and she never responded.
Hi, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them has already shown a defect after a relatively short time (the fabric has a hole in the front part of the chair).
I ask for your support.
Air pumps are ideal for adding extra oxygen to an aquarium.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using air lifters.
This series is offered by us in 3 versions.
Look at the table at the end of the offer.
There, you can see the services in comparison.
If the pumps are powerful enough, you can run entire facilities with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with 2 or more outlets are suitable, so that you can connect multiple outlets.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model, but a fan pump is also suitable for setting an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (which can be found in our shop) or with a decoration, which turns the air bubbles into a function.
Here a treasure chest, shell or something similar would be mentioned.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction and thus ensures low operating noises.
Installation is very easy.
The fan pump is connected to a drain, etc. using a 4/6 mm air hose...and then you can get started.
The fan pump should be the same, or higher than the water level and should be mounted externally.
If the fan pump is lower than the water level, a check valve should be installed between the pump and the water.
Simply cut the air hose and put the valve in between.
This would prevent the water from running backwards if the water from the pool was running through the pump...
If the fan pump is to be placed outside, it should, like other air pumps, be covered and protected from moisture
The pumps in the MK series are pure powerhouses that use little energy
Even though we list the processing time here on eBay as 3 days, we pack daily and the packages are also picked up daily here.
If everything goes well on the way, it goes very quickly.
We just want to prevent a little bit, so that no one is upset just because it took a little longer.
It would be so, not everyone has understanding for all the employees who also work in the logistics industry...of course, here Corona doesn't stop.
Please don't rate negatively just because the delivery is delayed, that is solely due to the parcel services.
Of course, we like to complain about these services, even though we are currently saying...they have it damn hard
This is also very different from region to region.
Do not be evil, stay healthy, and we all hope that better times will come again.
How long does it take to order the yellow ones with and without armrests?
Can you also order the legs here in light?
Amazon founder Bezo sends astronaut daughter and moderator into outer space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV presenter and four other passengers have taken a short trip into space.
On Saturday, they were transported by the "New Shepard" rocket system of the Blue Origin company founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The start and landing of the approximately ten-minute flight took place in the west of the US state of Texas.
Under a brilliant blue sky, Bezos personally greeted the freshly minted astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, dressed in a blue spacesuit, as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
Under the applause of friends, family members and employees of Blue Origin, the six passengers climbed out one by one and hugged the Amazon founder.
According to Blue Origin, they were in the air for ten minutes and 13 seconds and reached an altitude of 107 kilometers.
The 74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of 1961 NASA astronaut Alan Shepard (1923-1998), after whom Blue Origin's rocket system is named, and the 50-year-old TV presenter Michael Strahan were honorary guests of the company, the other four passengers had paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not share how much each paid for their ticket.
After the short flight, Laura Shepard Churchley recalled her father's mission.
He had to work hard and do everything himself.
She was just along for the ride, said the 74-year-old with a laugh.
Michael Strahan also commented enthusiastically.
He would like to return to space as soon as possible, said the moderator.
"New Shepard" flies up to 100 kilometres high
The New Shepard rocket system flies largely autonomously.
The capsule, which was detached from the rocket during the flight, reached an altitude of about 100 kilometers above the earth, at times experiencing weightlessness, before the reusable object was slowed down by large parachutes and landed.
The International Air Transport Association and many other experts see 100 kilometers above the earth as the boundary to space, but there is no binding international regulation.
It was already the third crewed flight of Blue Origin: In the first one in July, Amazon founder Bezos himself was on board, along with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot and an 18-year-old Dutchman.
The second one in October featured the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner, who became world-famous with his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek", as well as the former Nasa engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the deputy head of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics have accused Bezos and Blue Origin of pushing the business of space tourism ahead largely without scientific research interests for the benefit of humanity and without regard for the climate.
With the push of a button, you can easily choose whether your "Smart Stone" should permanently light up in one colour or play through its entire colour spectrum.
When switched to colour change, the light stone retains a light colour for around one minute, before gently changing to the next decorative colour.
The solid construction of the 'Smart Stone' light is all-year-round outdoors.
In snowy surroundings, her light is even particularly good - only with a shortened light duration is to be expected, as soon as the days get shorter.
In winter, just make sure that no snow interferes with the function of the solar module.
Smart Stone uses a NiMh battery in the common Mignon (AA) format, which can be easily replaced if necessary.
You can obtain a suitable replacement battery from our web shop and thereby further extend the service life of your decorative light.
High-gloss effect spray, which makes smooth surfaces look like chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, in particular for the design of wheels, wheel hub caps, and paintable plastic parts with appropriate pre-treatment.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is offering a wipe- and weather-resistant chrome spray for the first time.
The best effect is achieved on a black background, e.g. by priming with DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and as a set including Effect Primer and dust-binding cloth for the optimal preparation of the paintwork.
For use on metal, wood, glass, paintable hard plastics, stone.
Perfect, that's right :) do I need to add anything else?
They only need the tracking number in my mail?
Someone who works in biochemistry or has studied biochemistry
I am currently studying the first semester of biochemistry, and I actually find the subject itself quite interesting, and I don't mind being in the lab either (I've already completed the inorganic chemistry practicum).
Of course, I also researched career opportunities before starting my studies, but at that time I also thought that I would definitely like to study up to and including the doctorate.
But at the moment, I'm having doubts, especially depressing me are the career prospects.
On the one hand (Studycheck etc), one always hears about great career opportunities and the profession being totally in demand, on the other hand, one always hears about unemployed biologists and incredibly poorly paid jobs.
So, I would really like to know:
1) What are you currently working on?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What did you study/what training did you do?
4) Would you do it all again?
Thanks for your answers!
I'm currently really unsure and am thinking about perhaps breaking off my studies in 2022 and doing an apprenticeship as an IT specialist.
If you have any experience with this, feel free to write it down as well :)
Extra stress ahead of holidays & bank holiday weekends
It came up for me last week.
But I had to use my long weekend to relax from it.
That's why it's only now that we're adding a post.
Not only before big holidays, such as the Christmas holidays, there is a lot of stress in our business.
As it seems, there are also holidays plus bridge days.
It was like this: Last week was the Assumption of the Blessed Virgin Mary, which we call "Auffahrt" in Switzerland.
On Friday, the vast majority of people and businesses will make a bridge day, which is therefore semi-official.
It was a long 4-day weekend last week.
So, what happened last week?
Stress everywhere.
Lots of e-mails that had to be sent out before the holiday, order here, order there, everything *absolutely* before the long weekend.
Because... yes, because?
Because "next week then" sounds like so much time and it must not be?
Or because people really want to get as much done in a shortened week as they would in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed on Wednesday, but I was also extremely annoyed.
What is the point of this self-flagellation because of holidays?
Why do we have holidays, if we are not allowed to enjoy them?!
Mind you, the stress did not come from above, the colleagues were all quite independent like that.
My question is simple: Are we the only ones, the Swiss?
Is this our reformed-evangelical way?
Or do you know it in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her native Thuringia - but she doesn't have any presents yet.
"The beautiful thing is, even if there's no snow in Erfurt, you can just go to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest", said the actress and singer on Hit Radio FFH.
She'll get into the holiday spirit by baking and crafting with her son.
"I love it," said Catterfeld.
Until the contemplative days, however, she still has a lot to do: "For the first time, I don't have any presents yet, I have to get started now".
NEKTON-Bio supports a smooth moulting process and the formation of new feathers.
NEKTON-Bio contains all of the vital vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg of biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The majority of feather damage that occurs in bird husbandry is caused solely by nutritional errors.
Since the plumage consists of a protein-containing substance, a particularly rich and balanced protein diet of the bird is required for the formation of a flawless feather coat.
In order to have a functioning metabolism, the daily food must contain enough vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
Much of the animal loss that occurs during the moult is due to inadequate or unbalanced protein intake and/or inadequate supply of vitamins and minerals.
In the composition of NEKTON-Bio, the unfavourable ratio of amino acids in most plant-based feed is explicitly taken into account and balanced.
During the application of NEKTON-Bio, no other vitamin preparation should be given.
NEKTON-Bio is water-soluble in cold water and can be simply given via the drinking water or via the soft food.
Thanks, I found it
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work
DDR-Handarbeitsmodell Altbau E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/ DR, die Lok war in Schlesien und Mitteldeutschland im Einsatz, die sehr seltene Lok stammt wahrscheinlich aus dem Umbauvorschlag des Modelleisenbahner ME Heft 11/1968, gebraucht mit Spielspuren und Fehlteilen siehe Fotos, Funktion gut, Die Baureihe E 95 ist eine schwere Güterzug-Elektrolokomotive der Deutschen Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), die für die Traktion schwerer Kohleganzzüge im schlesischen Netz konzipiert worden ist, womöglich stammt der Bausatz auch von der Kleinserienfirma ZSCHUTSCHKE und BACHMANN.
A locomotive is located in the DB Museum in Halle (Saale) and is in operational condition
In 1924, the German State Railway Company commissioned AEG to submit proposals for an electric locomotive that was to be able to haul 2,200-ton coal trains and 530-ton passenger trains at a travel speed of 45 km/h on this line.
A maximum speed of 65 km/h was required.
Thus, in March 1926, the DRG determined the delivery as a 1'Co+Co1' locomotive with Tatzlager drive by AEG with the delivery of the mechanical part, and the Siemens-Schuckertwerke with the electrical part.
Between December 1927 and June 1928, six locomotives were delivered, which received the operating numbers E 95 01–06.
All of them survived the Second World War and found themselves on the territory of the future GDR afterwards.
In 1946, the locomotives arrived in the Soviet Union as reparation goods.
They returned to Germany in November 1952.
In the Reichsbahn repair facility in Dessau, it was determined that all six locomotives were worthy of restoration.
[4] As the re-electrification of the central German network progressed, there was an increasing demand for locomotives for heavy freight services. In 1959, the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were overhauled, while the other machines were used as a source of spare parts.
Here, the E 04, E 44 and E 94 locomotives, which were available in greater numbers, were first built up.
Only when it became clear that the number of processed cases on the E 94 could not be increased further, did the E 95 come into the focus of the processing.
[4] At first the locomotives were stationed at the Leipzig-Wahren railway depot.
They came to the Halle P depot in 1960.
They were usually used on their own timetable, mostly in front of coal trains from the Geiseltal in the direction of Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
With increasing age, the complicated controls of the locomotives proved to be problematic.
Therefore, it often happened that shooters got stuck during switching actions.
Then the guard, who is always travelling on this locomotive, had to use a hammer and a wooden wedge to release the brakes while the train was in motion.
Damage to the drive motors occurred more frequently and led to months-long failures in the locomotive.
[5] As enough new locomotives were available at the end of the 1960s and a significant expansion of the electric network was not planned at that time, the Reichsbahn was able to do without old locomotives and most of the splinter classes, so the E 95 was taken out of service.
In addition, the Deutsche Reichsbahn only wanted to operate electric locomotives with one person, which would have been a problem in train operation due to the mentioned difficulties with the machines and the visibility from the driver's cab.
[5] After the E 95 02 and E 95 03 were taken out of service in mid-1969, the E 95 01 was the last to be taken out of service on 5 October 1970.
The proposed new designation 255 001 was thus never used.
All locomotives were dismantled, with the exception of the E 95 02.
The E 95 02 was set up as a switch heater at Halle Central Station as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10.
It took some time until the responsible people at the Reichsbahn could be convinced that the E 95 was worth preserving as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the first external restoration of the locomotive began with the aim of being able to present it at a vehicle exhibition in the Dessau RAW.
[5] Since then, it has been part of the Dresden Traffic Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the interior of the locomotive was completed.
The locomotive is cared for at the DB Museum in Halle (Saale).
Since 1995, employees of the Traditionsgemeinschaft Bw Halle P have been working on the operational restoration of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive could first be presented at an exhibition in the museum's Bw Arnstadt with a new inner and outer paint finish, where the transformers were checked and five drive motors were operational.
The locomotives were in use until 1945 on the Silesian Mountain Railway and its branch lines, where they proved their worth due to their reliable drive and low maintenance costs.
In February 1945, the machines were relocated to Leipzig for the central German network.
Its main area of operations was initially Silesia
Handwork model H0 in OVP, function good, it is necessary to carry out optical rework on the locomotive, it is dusty, with play marks, musty smell !!!, very rare handwork model, very small run - perhaps the kit also comes from the small series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN
Packaging may have labels and storage markings.
Yes, the F-parts are it
I received a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The middle beam is held up by two feet. Unfortunately, these are too narrow and the beam cannot be mounted on the feet.
What do we do now?
I can't put the bed together.
The middle beam is held up by two feet, which are unfortunately produced defectively.
The middle bar does not fit into the intended holder.
Therefore, I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be sent off?
No, no flats.
That's, according to the installation instructions, the correct shape, they were just too narrow
But that doesn't matter.
As long as they fulfil their purpose
They're not flat on me
Could I get these sent to me?
Hello #NAME#, shall I explain the problem to you again?
House fire with two minor injuries and high damage
Two people were slightly injured in a fire in a house in Upper Bavaria.
In addition, an estimated damage in the six-figure euro range has been incurred, as the police reported on Sunday.
The fire had probably spread from a carport to the adjoining house in Kinsau (Landsberg-am-Lech district).
Two residents were taken to hospital on Sunday with minor smoke inhalation, officials said.
The exact cause of the fire was initially unknown, but the police did not suspect arson.
The Fürstenfeldbruck Criminal Investigation Department has taken over further investigations.
It will arrive much later, however
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To combat fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccination photo
Uğur Şahin published a photo of his first vaccination in early 2021 on the social network "LinkedIn"
Biontech CEO Uğur Şahin has not yet spoken publicly about his vaccination status.
Now the entrepreneur has published a photo that shows his Corona vaccination.
The illness of a friend had inspired him, said Şahin.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, has published a photo showing him receiving a vaccination against the coronavirus.
On social media, there were false claims that I was not vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received three doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," wrote Şahin in a post on the "LinkedIn" network on Friday.
"For months, friends have been urging me to post a photo of me getting the vaccine to counter those false rumors."
Up until now, he has rejected this, because the communication should not revolve around himself.
But a call last week changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened when I learned that an old school friend of mine is currently fighting for his life.
He is fighting a severe Covid-19 infection and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family are not vaccinated, wrote Şahin further.
He didn't ask why.
However, the most common cause seems to be fear, which is often fanned by misinformation and mistrust.
Fear is difficult to counter with facts, sometimes it's better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating on the internet, in which Uğur Şahin says he is not vaccinated.
However, the video was made in December 2020, as Deutsche Welle itself clarified.
"At the moment, I am not legally allowed to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
There is a prioritization in the vaccination of the vaccine in Germany.
By now, the prioritisation has long been lifted - and according to his own statements, the Biontech boss has been vaccinated three times.
Fire in substation: Ten thousand people without electricity
In several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia the lights went out on Friday evening: no more electricity and in many cases, no heating either.
A fire had knocked out a transformer station.
After a fire with serious damage to a substation, tens of thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg district in North Rhine-Westphalia had to do without electricity for around 24 hours.
On Friday evening, the lights went out for the 41,000 affected residents and residents in several municipalities as a result of the fire.
The utility Westnetz reported that on Saturday numerous emergency power generators were in operation until the large-scale outage was finally completely resolved late in the evening.
Firefighters and helpers and helpers from the THW provided support in the municipalities.
Authorities offered care places in schools and called for neighborhood help.
The supplier thanked the affected people for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have caused significant disruption.
We also thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire brigades and the THW for their tireless efforts," said the head of the Primary Technology Department, Florian Witt, in a statement on Saturday evening.
The repair of the damage will take a few more days, as the Westnetz fitters were only able to put some of the lines back into operation on a provisional basis, he explained.
A technical defect caused the fire, according to the company.
Electricity is flowing again
According to Westnetz, the fire that broke out at around 7:15 p.m. on Friday severely damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switchgear at the Neunkirchen-Seelscheid substation.
There, extensive cleaning and repair work is needed.
At the same time, a connection to a 30,000-volt voltage level was created.
With the help of this bypass, the power supply is up and running again.
Since 6 pm on Saturday, more than 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had power again.
Another 20,000 inhabitants of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid have been gradually connected since 9.30 p.m.
Since 9:15 p.m., those who were still affected by the outage have also had electricity.
More than 80 electricians from Westnetz and partner companies were on the job.
The authorities had also called for help from neighbours after setting up emergency power supplies for important buildings on Saturday afternoon.
"It is now important that the citizens take care of elderly or single people in their neighbourhood and inform the local fire stations if help is needed," explained District Administrator Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
When setting up and running emergency power generators, the focus was mainly on the residents of nursing homes.
In addition, according to the authorities, temporary care places were set up in schools for those people who could not care for themselves or who needed electricity-dependent medical devices or who needed medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately the ceiling is sold out in Germany.
Can I buy them from you and pay in Euros?
It's the #PRS_ORG# day blanket in blue and green.
I hope you have a nice day as well and please stay healthy ♡
However, I can't mount the undercarriage on the table top.
This is Custom #NAME#.
There are 3 versions of it.
We were looking for those with table tops of #NUMBER#
We have a diameter of 155cm.
My #PRS_ORG# arrived today, but I can't push them together to shorten them.
Can you help me there?
Otherwise I would have to return them as they are not suitable for the purpose.
I would appreciate feedback
Yes, that is really easier!
Then we'll do it that way!
Can you send me the return label by email?
The repair is now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
Before the purchase, however, I had not restarted the E-#PRS_ORG#.
Should I do it now?
I find such a low credit almost insulting.
We disagree with that
Nordic Combined: Riiber wins Nordic Combined
The German Nordic Combined skiers Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid have sprinted onto the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
The duo once again had to concede defeat to the outstanding Norwegian Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started the cross-country run with a large lead after the ski jump.
Return of the order number #NUMBER#
When will the money be transferred back into my account?
Yes we have both updated to the new version and are using version 4.5...
It could be that they have already heard of the problem
I bought a book directly from my #PRS_ORG, it seems to be there too.
When I try to open it, the message pops up, oops!
This document could not be opened.
If the file is possibly faulty, report it to customer service.
As far as I can see it's a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can they help me?
Chat connection is gone now what?
I have to work in between too!
In order for the paint application to be even and clean, you should clean the parts with some soapy water to remove dust, grease and fingerprints, rinse with clear water and dry.
Before you put the brush on your model with a new color for the first time, it is advisable to practice 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the inside of the building parts that are no longer visible or on a yogurt cup.
The first mark on the part
Hold the brush steady, stroke after stroke.
A slight overlap of the paint layers later results in a uniform surface.
Avoid swiping the brush back and forth quickly.
This creates unrealistic-looking areas.
A model is not a garden fence.
Start with the light colors.
Otherwise, the dark ones could shine through later.
The metallic tones and metallic colours come at the very end with a separate brush.
Otherwise, unpleasant metallic streaks can occur, if they are mixed with normal colours.
Let the painted parts dry for a day before installing them.
The models achieve their original appearance through the decals, i.e. the stickers.
From insignias on aircraft, through ship names to trim and badges on car models: Decals give the model the finishing touch.
Apply the decals in the correct order while the parts are still easy to reach.
An aircraft cockpit is easier to cover up before it is installed in the fuselage.
Time, patience and a steady hand are more important than the right tools like scissors, tweezers and toothpicks.
Cut out each needed decal individually and lay them out in front of you.
Decals are also called waterslide decals, because you moisten the back of them with water until the backing paper turns dark from the moisture.
Then, you just slide the picture a little bit off the paper and place the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you have also previously moistened).
While you hold the decal in place on the model with a tool, pull the carrier paper off to the side.
Caution: Always check that the image is in the right place before you slide it completely off the paper, so that it does not stick to your finger, crease or even tear.
Suck up any excess water with a household cloth.
Not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only open a book for a short time, once I look for something else I can't read the book anymore and have to log out and log in and load the book again and search for the place where I left off.
I have already communicated with you on Saturday.
Can I get this by email?
Even for all 3 packages?
Because the lamp came to me in 3 separate packages
Okay, anyway, thank you very much!
Then I will buy elsewhere as soon as the money is back.
But will I get it back without any problems?
Infertility treatment with private health insurance / What is an "insurance case"?
Hello everyone,
We were in fertility treatment for some time, now, when it comes to billing the private health insurance, they are suddenly standing in the way.
One after the other:
We had applied for fertility treatment at the PKV in advance and received approval for 3 attempts.
The trials were in no way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.) restricted.
The first attempt led directly to a successful pregnancy and birth and was billed to the statutory health insurance.
Some time later, we tried to have a second child, and we went through 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but we had not yet claimed these from the private health insurance.
We applied again to have the costs covered by private health insurance and were again granted 3 more attempts.
After a few more attempts (we have done more attempts than promised, of course the most expensive ones are claimed from the private health insurance), we submitted the bills to the private health insurance and received the nasty surprise: instead of 5 attempts (2+3), the private health insurance will only reimburse 3 attempts.
The reason for this is that with the pregnancy/birth, the remaining 2 attempts of the first promise fall away.
The second wish for a child is a new insurance case.
According to the terms and conditions, however, "The insurance event begins with the start of treatment and ends when treatment is no longer required."
The questions for the experts in the round here:
* Who is right here, the private health insurance (only 3 attempts will be reimbursed) or us (5 attempts must be reimbursed)?
* Would the private health insurance have had to inform us that further attempts would be lost with a birth?
* Is the desire for a second child really a new insurance case?
Infertility (caused by blocked fallopian tubes) is not cured by the first child.
It would be great if the experts could give their opinion here.
Thanks in advance for your help!
Could you please send me the three options by email and tell me the best way to reach them
Okay.
We will not be ordering from them again.
When they add up my sales and those of my friend #NAME# (same address), they have obviously lost a good customer.
They are welcome to pass this on to their manager.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday the colleague told me that the repayment was triggered and now you're telling me that I have to send the thing back first.
I can't do anything about the fact that the chest of drawers arrives completely damaged
Please see what the colleague has written in the screenshot
It clearly states that the repayment was requested and I have still not received a repayment from #PRS_ORG#
They can tell their manager that they have now lost two regular customers.
My friend also ordered a number of pieces of furniture for our apartment through his account.
We will no longer do that now.
No, the defect only occurred after a few months.
An office chair must be able to withstand normal use.
Otherwise, they are not allowed to sell it as an office chair.
Regardless, the 24-month warranty applies.
No, I am not able to acquire a different type of packaging.
I will dismantle the cupboard and make it available to the transport company.
Good morning, I have a question about your series of #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional footstools, but unfortunately we can't find them in your store.
Can they help?
Topic of the week: The best low budget films
There is no general definition of what a low-budget film is, with exact budget limits.
The Wikipedia has this to say about it:
>A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
There are plenty of lists of low-budget films to be found online, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know interesting representatives of this category?
What are you attracted to about it?
And what do you perhaps not like at all?
I am a very good customer of yours, I have already furnished two apartments completely with your furniture.
She wanted to get the best price for the grey leather Odelle sofa.
Now that the delivery time has been extended again, is it also reliable?
Thank you very much
Sincerely,
If there is no phone number, a chat where you have to wait 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes in the waiting position...I'll give up again soon, because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half-victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
According to the political expert Raphael Bossong, the EU can announce a "half victory" in the conflict with the Belarusian regime.
The costs are very high and mean massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at the Belarus border with Poland and Lithuania, said Bossong to the Evangelical Press Service (epd).
The EU has not solved the confrontation in a sustainable way, explained the researcher at the Berlin Foundation for Science and Politics (SWP).
This state of limbo - Belarus is not quite giving in, but the EU feels like a winner - will probably continue for a while.
Bossong ruled that the way people are treated at the border is not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights.
Apparently there is an "increasing normalisation of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole has not decided to oppose this, it is at the expense of fundamental rights.
This development is weakening the cohesion in the Union at the same time.
"She can't apparently get her way if a member state decides to do its own thing", as is currently the case with Poland, which does not even allow the EU border protection agency Frontex access to the border.
In addition, the EU pays another price for its policy at the border with Belarus, says Bossong: A basic agreement on asylum policy is made more difficult because the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to Poland's Border Guard, meanwhile, migrants have once again tried to enter Poland from Belarus.
Fifty-five migrants were arrested and returned to the border overnight, a spokeswoman for the authority said on Sunday.
The Polish officers were pelted with stones by the migrants near the town of Czeremsza.
A soldier was hit in the face and had to be treated by a military doctor, according to the report.
In total, the border guards registered 52 attempted border crossings within 24 hours.
A group of 28 migrants had already overcome the border barriers on Friday evening.
Thousands of people from countries such as Iraq and Afghanistan had crossed or tried to cross the border between Belarus and the EU in recent months.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukashenko, the ruler in Minsk, of luring them with the prospect of entry into the EU.
Poland and Lithuania were reported to have sealed off sections of the border.
The EU has sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that bring migrants and refugees into the country.
In addition, EU commissioners travelled to the home countries of the people to prevent them from leaving.
The most effective element of the EU reaction was the pressure on airlines, said Bossong.
"There, the EU has thrown its market power onto the scales and demonstrated its resolve to operate with a heavy hand and extraterritorial sanctions".
Minsk must also take into account the internal political costs.
The Belarusian society is probably not prepared for the fact that the security apparatus regularly funnels thousands of people through the country.
Mercedes protests after controversial F1 finale
According to Mercedes, Max Verstappen broke two rules during the race.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes has lodged an appeal.
The Silver Arrows suspect two rule violations in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest relates to an alleged infringement by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull in the last safety car phase, when he is said to have overtaken illegally.
A second appeal was lodged against the result at the end of the race.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed in accordance with the rules.
Verstappen had overtaken Lewis Hamilton in the Mercedes on the last lap and raced to his first Formula 1 title.
The maneuver took place shortly after the end of a Safety Car phase, in which the Dutch driver had overtaken the car in front of him.
I'll check it out.
I will speak with the bank and get back to you
Thanks for the support
Free entry for members: Europa-Park holds SC Freiburg fan day
Europa-Park, the namesake of the Europa-Park Stadium of SC Freiburg, has invited to the SC Freiburg Fan Day.
As the park announced, members and season ticket holders of the sports club from Breisgau, as well as members of the fan community, were allowed to visit Europa-Park for free on this day.
In addition, there were vouchers for drinks and sausages.
The roller coaster cars lit up red and white on this day.
Fuchsle, Ed Euromaus, and many red-and-white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," said the park.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the leisure park in Rust, 40 kilometres north of Freiburg, has already existed since the early 1990s.
At the first SC Freiburg Fan Day in Europa-Park, it has once again been shown how well the partnership fits.
To see happy fans having fun together on the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa-Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is it €#NUMBER# and not like originally 1699€?
Stages in the career of the new world champion Verstappen
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has done it.
The Dutchman gets his first world title in his seventh year in Formula 1 with Red Bull.
His way to the top of the king's class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: Verstappen lost the karting world championship after a crash in Sarno.
Father Jos Verstappen left him annoyed at a petrol station on the way back.
His mother, Sophie Kumpen, collects the teenager in the following car.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team gets promising young talent in Verstappen.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He continues to compete in the European Formula 3 for the time being.
2015, Australia: Verstappen starts in a Grand Prix at the age of 17 years and 166 days as the youngest driver in history.
Because of a defect, he has to stop his Toro Rosso early in Melbourne.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro Rosso driver Verstappen is also the youngest driver to score points in Formula 1 at the age of 17 years and 180 days.
Verstappen takes seventh place in Sepang at the Malaysian Grand Prix.
2016, Spain: Verstappen wins his first race for Red Bull.
At 18 years and 228 days, he will sensationally become the youngest Grand Prix winner in Formula One history in Barcelona.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his pole premiere in Budapest - he's not the youngest.
At the age of 21, he left behind Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes teammate Lewis Hamilton.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit has been reached.
Verstappen celebrates his first world title at the Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi at the age of 24 - with an overtaking manoeuvre against Hamilton in the final round. dpa
I'd already had #NUMBER# a huge argument with you when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# chest of drawers.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "Daheim"
As part of the reading series "LiteraTour Nord", author Judith Hermann read from her current novel "Daheim" on Friday in the sold-out Blue Note, and also acted as moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house on the coast and listens sensitively to the nocturnal sounds at her front door.
I submitted a contact form yesterday to return an item but have not received an email confirmation or anything.
My question would be whether my request has been granted.
Not everyone has the time for your stupid chat and cheap knock-offs from China.
Your mistake, which you can fix and not all of us from our household.
Contact Ms. #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
We had chatted yesterday and agreed that I/Ms #NAME# would receive an email with a £60 voucher, another order of the #PRS_ORG# bedside table and a return label.
This email has not yet been received.
The package is to be delivered to #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Best regards
The LokSound 5 decoder can play up to 10 channels simultaneously.
Each channel can now be sampled at up to 16 bit/31250 kHz, finally offering Hi-Fi quality on your system.
There is practically no difference to the original to be heard.
An up to 3W Class-D audio power amplifier drives the speakers, which must have an impedance between 4 Ohms and 32 Ohms.
The massive 128 Mbit sound memory provides sufficient capacity.
All individual sounds can be individually adjusted in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a rigid schedule allows the exemplary simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three individually adjustable braking functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
Sorry, but just because he says he's not an anti-Semite doesn't mean anything.
That's like when an AfDler says he has nothing against foreigners.
Neither of them will admit their i.
But Kollegah constantly reproduces some kind of antisemitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself, then you should just leave it.
Yes, wow, then you are just as little to be taken seriously as Kollegah.
Anyone who seriously questions evolution as a whole is just completely lost.
According to me, a god has set the whole thing in motion.
But once you're a creationist you have to believe that the earth is 10,000 years old and that science is just making things up.
And that makes you an enemy of science and not to be taken seriously like Kollegah
To achieve an optimal field of vision, the magnifying glass should be brought as close to the eye as possible.
The specifically aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the magnifying glass practically without distortion and colour errors up to the edge zone.
Often, loupes are marked with magnification specifications.
These figures are only valid for exactly specified conditions, which rarely correspond to the conditions of use.
To get the most out of your magnifier, please note the information in the "Technical data" table (See instructions for use in the packaging).
Light reflections occur on the lens surfaces of all optical devices – including magnifying glasses.
These reflections are significantly reduced by an anti-reflection coating.
Under optimal conditions of use - loupe close to the eye - reflections on the lens surfaces are less noticeable.
Further information can be found in the accompanying user manual (available in German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Magnifier ID card magnifier Magnification Pocket magnifier Reading magnifier Reading aid
Whether as a reading aid for on the go or just for everyday trivialities: the Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal helper as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its handy format.
And their hard shell makes them robust against special stresses in everyday life.
Each magnifier comes with a credit-card sized sleeve for storage and safe transport.
They are bidding on those parts, which are described in the pictures or under "What are you bidding on".
What condition is the item being offered in?
Of course, everyone can miss something once in a while, because no one is error-free - should this be the case, just write a message and it will be clarified to your full satisfaction (either by exchange, partial repayment, or complete repayment).
They get a proper bill.
It will always be sent, unless the buyer specifically requests otherwise, insured with a tracking number via DHL!
Please refer to the above shipping conditions for individual shipping costs.
There are no additional handling costs.
Everyone says ok, authorized, how can I check more specifically?
yes, both the email address
#PRS_ORG# I will do very nice and good service, although it took a long time to get to a person, they were super
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already contacted you under customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it was said before.
They can't ship from the UK due to #PRS_ORG#.
Christmas tree sale in Schönwolde: Women search for the Christmas trees in the municipality of Krembz
Farmer Frank Diers has experienced many strange situations when selling Christmas trees.
Once, a man was even driven home without his partner, because the two could not agree.
Every year he plants about 2000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced some curious situations.
This makes the pre-Christmas season a little bit more fun, he says.
And what about the voucher?
Otherwise, I'm gone as a customer?!
After all, I received a faulty delivery and now I have to pay the full price for it.
Then I'll rate it accordingly!
We don't need to have a debate here about which is the better dish, but there is a certain similarity between the two.
Both consist of meat grilled on a rotating spit.
And both have therefore their name.
In German, an equivalent might be something like the "Dreher," which doesn't sound nearly as appetizing.
Problems with fiber optics + Devolo DLan/Magic
We've had a new fibre-optic connection in the house for a few weeks now.
Unfortunately, I'm now having problems building a stable Wi-Fi network.
Previously, I had a 50 Mbit DSL connection and used Devolo DLan, which received and sent 50 Mbit without any problems, except for a few outages.
The new fibre optic connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590. These also arrive at the DLan module, which is connected to the FritzBox.
However, at the other DLan module, which sends the Wifi, I don't get the full 500, but the more I move away from the module in the house, the less I get (i.e. I use a plug that is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This means that the Internet with the new fibre optic connection is now even slower on the first floor than it was before (\~45 Mbit).
I also ordered a new Devolo Magic Set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than DLan, but there were similarly large losses here.
Could someone explain to me why so much internet speed is "lost" through the power line with fiber optic cable?
And is LAN really the only solution?
It would be extremely time-consuming to lay LAN cables in that house.
I'm really at my wits' end, which is why I've created a special account here.
That is why I would be all the more pleased to receive an answer.
When it's time to switch current account
Those who thought that now there would be peace with the Giro accounts have been deceived.
While many banks have used the autumn to get their customers to confirm the fee increases of the past with all sorts of tricks, the free limits for negative interest rates are also falling.
Deutsche Bank, for example, was long considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros.
Now she has just halved the tax-free allowance and even quadrupled it for daily money.
In a first step, the limit was lowered only for customers of the group's Postbank division - to 50,000 euros for current and investment accounts and to 25,000 euros for cash accounts.
However, these lower allowances now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, a spokesperson confirmed on request.
This is not just for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements made with existing customers".
Commerzbank had already gone down to a limit of 50,000 euros, which still applies, as does it at ING Deutschland.
The direct bank DKB, which is popular with cost-conscious customers, has reduced the free thresholds in two stages, first to 50,000 euros, and now to 25,000 euros.
After all: More than 100 banks now have a free allowance of 25,000 euros or less, according to figures from the internet portal Verivox.
The Sparda Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the consumer centres, which in the first instance before the Berlin Regional Court even won the case against this rule.
Now the banks are already discussing whether the institutes should form provisions - in case the higher authorities also declare the negative interest rates in principle to be unlawful and many millions of bank customers have to be paid back.
The table top for 8 people was delivered instead of the one for 6 people.
The annex is the one for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston hires a whole beauty army
She is now officially at the top of Hollywood.
But their lives are a rollercoaster.
Jennifer Aniston (52) was chosen by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter" as the most influential woman of the year.
For her, who made a splash in 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of her series "The Morning Show", this success is first and foremost the result of a lot of discipline and work.
A whole army of assistants, stylists and trainers take care of her appearance.
After all, so Aniston, she treats herself to a chip a day (yes, read correctly: one SINGLE chip from the bag).
That their hearts are beating equally for both female and male fans is actually a miracle.
Maybe because she simply has bad luck with love - and is still looking for the great love.
And has crossed off the baby wish from the list.
Prior to that, she was constantly asked when she was going to become a mother.
That hurt her.
The people who asked that question have no idea what's going on with me personally, medically, why I can't.
It was really hurtful.
Let's hope that success and fame also bring happiness.
An unworthy end to a career: Räikkönen has to give up
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 was even quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn took off his gloves and wiped the sweat from his forehead.
That's it.
After a driving error and a slight collision with a barrier, Räikkönen had to stop his Alfa Romeo after less than half of the race distance at the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
It was his 349th and last Grand Prix, the "Iceman" is ending his career in the motorsport king class.
For the farewell, his wife Minttu and the two children had also travelled to the United Arab Emirates.
Räikkönen's biggest success was winning the World Championship in 2007 with Ferrari.
He achieved 21 Grand Prix wins, started 18 times from pole and was on the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup victory - Nolte wins in two-man bob - Sport
The brand of the Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Björndalen with 94 successes is the goal of the bobsleigh pilot.
"I have done the calculations, I would have to win nine and a half times a season to make it to Cortina 2026," said the double Olympic champion from BSC Oberbärenburg, who won two successes in two days at the races in Winterberg.
On Saturday he fended off the attack from Johannes Lochner by five hundredths of a second, moving from third to first.
Then he changed something in the material setting and on Sunday he drove with a lead of 0.30 seconds.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle), he beat the Brit Brad Hall.
The Austrian, Benjamin Maier, came in third.
"We took a bigger risk today and were rewarded," said Friedrich, who also won his 22nd race in a row.
Berchtesgaden's Johannes Lochner, who was travelling to Stuttgart, came fifth after finishing second previously.
Christoph Hafer from BC Bad Feilnbach landed in eighth place after placing fourth in the first race.
"If I knew what he was doing differently, then I would do it too," said Lochner.
Nolte with home win - Podium for Jamanka
In the women's event, Laura Nolte won her third victory of the season on her home track in the two-woman bob.
After finishing fourth the day before in the monobob, she raced to World Cup victory on Sunday in the German triple success with pusher Deborah Levi.
Two-woman bobsleigh Olympic champion Mariama Jamanka from BRC Thuringia came second with Germany's fastest sprinter, Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
In addition to her Olympic qualification, she earned her first podium finish this winter.
The Wiesbadenerin Kim Kalicki landed with Leonie Fiebig in third place.
For me, it was super cool, first podium place in the World Cup, I'm super happy that Mariama is taking me with her.
I am super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasised: "It's not just pushing, but there is also a lot to do around it".
Jamanka was a little frustrated by the not-quite-flawless rides, but said: "It's going in the right direction."
I had the duvet in my basket and could buy it now!!!
What am I supposed to do?
I did not receive it and therefore could not redeem it, which is why I finally asked about it.
Due to Corona, I had completely different problems last year and never had the time for it.
And now it was said that he was out of date, which made me very angry.
Look in the chat, it was about the Asare bench.
I want to return it and then re-order it as it's on sale right now :)
Why will delivery only start on 16.3?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, only when I tap on it does an extra field appear with the message
Was taken yesterday by your colleague.
Why is this a problem today?
I also sent you pictures of the wrong item that was delivered.
But we do want the shelf module, just a new and undamaged one.
And not cancel the entire order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello lovely ladies and girls and women,
I have a lot of things that I just want to write down and maybe it's the same for one or the other...
I'm 24, I have cPTSD, I'm a full-time student, and I'm a dog mama - apart from the fact that my dog doesn't scream or go to kindergarten, he's basically my child.
My boyfriend (of 6 years) is sick, got a 2nd degree burn on Monday, and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
Yesterday, I visited him, because I also have emotional needs and because I want to see and feel him; we cuddled a lot and it was nice.
I helped him in the shower (because his hand is bandaged due to a burn).
He is also under the weather, and we are seeing each other less (1-2x a week) which is very hard on my needs for affection and love.
My little dog just has a tummy ache, I cooked for him and now he's lying in his blanket and has relaxed a bit after I was there with the heat lamp and stroking him.
I live with my sister and my mother, and my mother is away for a month.
Now we have homework to do as well, which of course we divide up between us.
But even cooking for myself is a lot of work for me...
My PTSD is well under control right now, I'm half-way through therapy and getting by.
Not great but I'm coping and I'm almost symptom-free.
My university is demanding a lot of me at the moment (for me), tomorrow at 3 p.m. I have a written test for which I haven't done anything yet, and the day after tomorrow I have an anatomy class for which I should at least prepare a bit.
And next week, I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what comes after that is in my calendar and not in my head because there is no more space there.
So, my week goes like this: Only until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But then it all continues, doesn't it?
Only until the birthday.
Only until the start of the holidays.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so it goes on forever.
I think I'm just so stressed that I need those mental touchstones, otherwise I can't handle it.
Somehow I feel guilty and "chaotic", but I can't do it any other way...
Do you feel the same way?
Seriously, I'm endlessly grateful that I don't have to work.
I am really infinitely grateful, I can't put it into words.
I don't know if I would have survived otherwise.
I think it also has something to do with women's mental load, and that's why I thought I would certainly find fellow sufferers here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
I have received my order today, unfortunately the whole thing is a different colour and the surface is scratched and the table leg has a mark.
The first delivery was exactly as shown on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we change the table now, will I get a different colour or what?
The cancellation email was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
By the way, twice.
However, this was not confirmed.
Something completely different: I found out at school that many religion teachers don't believe in God and for them it's just another subject like maths or geography.
For me it was always a bit strange, perhaps also because I was brought up as a Christian and I always somehow believed in it.
How do you feel about that?
Perhaps you can also talk about work and/or study colleagues with different attitudes.
In principle, I understand the difference between private and professional and it makes sense to keep them separate.
After all, there is a syllabus and so on.
But I would also find it strange to have a physics teacher who doesn't believe in the theory of relativity.
What makes someone want to teach religion if they don't believe in it?
Maintaining culture or something like that?
Hope your question isn't too personal.
Can't it be changed or not?Feel free to write in English, I understand that well too.
That's been a very long time, then I'd advise against it
That's good, thank you.
I expect feedback soon, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thank you for your support #NAME#.
Film search help please
Hello dear people,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I think it was a film for young people.
The film has two time axes (or parallel worlds).
On the one hand, the Modern (the real world).
On the other hand, the past (or the realm of the dead) (I'm not quite sure).
Since I can't really describe it in the real world, there's a young woman.
And in the land of the dead, a young soldier (in a uniform similar to those of the soldiers from Pirates of the Caribbean).
For some reason, the paths cross and a plot develops.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the land of the dead who wants to bring the woman to this land in order to be able to live, I think.
The transition is also, I believe, the soldier's grave.
In the end, I think both soldiers are fighting against each other.
If that means anything to you, I am grateful for any response.
Our little one has only slept on her front from week 1.
Fast forward: still alive :D
Relax.
A child can take a lot more than you think.
Make sure everything around it is right, no cuddly toys, go in there more often and have a look, but no minutes of surveillance.
That drives you insane!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Oh, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always a blanket.
Look at your child when it's sleeping.
Does it turn its head to one side?
Can it stand up on its belly?
Or do you lie face down directly in the mattress?
From that, you can deduce whether everything is in order.
We've all grown up as well, and when my husband was born, for example, it was common practice to put the kids on their tummies to sleep.
Moreover, we are already "regular customers" with you and have already bought many articles
But why are you only offering me 20 euros?
Hello, I have already written to one of your colleagues yesterday and have not yet received any feedback.
It's about my wardrobe, which arrived yesterday (order number: #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right-hand drawer doesn't fit in the cupboard.
Please contact me as soon as possible.
The wardrobe is currently not usable.
To put it bluntly.
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know myself that not everything can be held.
And I also had a lot of fun with RBTV.
It's just that the politics of this channel are now below all criticism.
Almost every format is sponsored (ok), but then to go on a massive begging tour at the same time.
It was said to be an "independent" Internet broadcaster.
Quote from Arno: "We don't want to be a running newsstand."
What are you now?
An 0815 advertising channel, which tries to sell its BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then there are Marah's do's and don'ts.
Of course, they apply to everyone, except Simon and Etienne.
They can, of course, continue to insult people.
A Krogmann who is completely lacking in empathy and who, at the expense of the action, is trying to make ashes out of the rented rooms that have exploded.
How can one find all of this good?
Great if you like it, I find it dreadful.
I am requesting a call back as my delivered wooden table was defective.
Corpus break due to damaged delivery of #PRS_ORG#.
Whether as a comforter for tummy ache or just for cuddling – my little warm friend is very versatile.
Cherry pit pillows are a traditional home remedy for soothing warmth applications, as cherry pits can hold and release heat well.
The removable inner cushion can easily be heated in the microwave or oven.
The soft cover makes the application particularly pleasant, so that the little ones feel secure, even when they are not feeling so well.
The cherry stone cushion with cover is only suitable as a heat pad for the following areas of application:
Before warming, check for unusual smell, stock or burn marks and dispose of immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the cover before heating it up!
Heat in the microwave at a maximum of 300 watts for a maximum of 2 minutes (follow the microwave manufacturer's instructions!).
After heating, distribute the heat evenly in the cushion by shaking!
Afterwards, place the inner cushion back into the cover.
There may be slight moisture formation on the surface during the first heating, but this will disappear with repeated use.
Be sure to follow the instructions for warming, as longer times or higher energy levels can cause damage (danger of inflammation and burns!).
Before heating the pillow in the microwave, check the manufacturer's instructions to make sure heating grain products is allowed.
After putting the heated inner cushion back into the cover, please check the temperature of the cushion for suitability for babies (max. 43°C) on your forearm!
Do not use the cushion for acute and chronic, inflammatory or feverish conditions, circulatory problems, recent hematomas, bruises and open wounds, and for people with reduced pain sensitivity.
If you have existing skin, heart, vein, diabetes or tumour conditions, or if you are pregnant, please consult your doctor before use.
If seams have opened and loose kernels are escaping, discard the product and the loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is used on babies under 1 year of age, the child's temperature should be monitored regularly during application to prevent overheating!
All serious adverse events associated with the product must be reported to the manufacturer and to the relevant authority of the country in which the user is registered.
The cover is removable and can be washed in the machine at 30 °C.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt in second place after the first leg - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 can dream of returning to the football Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 is working its way out of the table cellar.
For Ingolstadt, it is not going well under the third trainer.
Jubilation in Darmstadt after the late win in the top game, joy in Hanover over interim coach Christoph Dabrowski and frustration in Ingolstadt after the unsuccessful debut under the new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery broken?
Last night, my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) was no longer charged by my power supply.
I bought this about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that the power supply alone was enough to operate.
No luck, the battery is empty, and the laptop doesn't start, despite the power supply being plugged in.
After that, I removed the battery, but nothing happened here either.
Perhaps you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use the laptop in network mode?
Is something else broken?
Thank you for your help!
I would like the delivery of the #PRS_ORG# up to my room.
How can I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But I don't know how high the seat is...
Often on tour and yet taking a lot of equipment with you?
No problem with the Peak Design Everyday V2 Backpack!
With a 20-liter capacity, it can easily swallow larger photography equipment, which can be safely stored using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what else you need for your everyday items remains well organised and separate from your camera equipment, thanks to the practical access points in the individually configurable interior.
With the "Update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2), the series also presents itself in a new look.
The sleek, minimalist design has it all - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions that reliably protect the interior of the backpack, while at the same time providing instant access to photo equipment.
This can be done in two ways: first, conventionally through the lid flap, which can be closed with the MagLatch locking system, a well-thought-out solution for effective protection that has already proven itself in the Messenger Bags.
There is a metal closure hook in the closure flap with matching anchor bars on the front of the backpack.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has taken different "fill levels" into account: there are 4 anchor bars, stably riveted, into which the closure hook can be hooked.
If the rucksack is fully loaded, you simply take the top beam, if it is more empty, a lower one.
The flap closure and hook are also magnetic.
This allows the backpack to be closed reliably, without engaging the hook.
The second possibility also fundamentally distinguishes the Everyday Backpack from other photo backpacks: in addition to the cover flap, there is also a zip opening on both sides of the backpack.
This eliminates the biggest drawback of traditional backpacks with top access - you no longer have to dig through your contents!
At the same time, this clever detail increases the practicality of the backpack enormously: if you take not only your photographic equipment, but also everyday items or travel luggage with you.
In the Everyday Backpack, you can individually configure the interior (more on this below) and thus store both things separately from each other - and access them independently through the two side openings.
You can also pull the backpack from the right side in front of your body to access the camera gear in the right main compartment, while the everyday items stay safely in the left side of the backpack and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, easy-to-adjust carry straps help.
And since the outer shell of the backpack is also made entirely from 100% recycled, weatherproof nylon, the contents will stay dry even if it's heading to Scotland in the autumn.
Unfortunately, I have been waiting in vain for the email from their support.
#NAME# sent me an email yesterday to confirm the commissioning of
Contact has been made with the freight forwarder to collect the wrongly delivered table.
So far I have not received a message.
I ask for an immediate settlement.
I've already written to the third support employee, and none of them got me any further than a promise that I'll receive an e-mail as confirmation.
This is the return of the wrongly delivered custom #NAME#
Is it foreseeable when the wardrobe could be delivered again?
Keeping him like that is not an option for me...
It works.
Thank you very much for your help
I hope you have a nice evening.
Hello, my order number is #NUMBER#. When will the article be delivered?
Order and payment was on 12.1.21.
I was delivered a completely different lamp than I ordered
Please call me
If you extend the voucher, I will place a larger order, but at least I kept the damaged piece of furniture and didn't return it.
And that the past year did not turn out as expected, I could not foresee, and so I was not able to redeem and clarify it in a timely manner.
But the damage I suffered as a customer and I do not accept that.
Rotinger brake discs are designed for the demands of the dynamic driver who knows the value of reliability and safety when braking, even under difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are cast and then machined (drilled and cut).
All customised panes are produced in short series according to individual technical characteristics, which are specific to certain panes and patterns.
On the basis of the individual technical drawing, a special manufacturing program is created that is adjusted to the balancing of the disk according to the characteristics of the original installation.
The modified windows produced in this way ensure high comfort and braking effectiveness.
The added openings increase the effectiveness of cooling the disk, while the cuts improve the cleaning of the brake disks and brake pads.
The aesthetic properties of our customized windows emphasize the character of each car with an attractive and eye-catching appearance.
Coloma is the town where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West Coast.
In the winter of 1848, a man discovered glittering nuggets in the water at the South Fork of the American River.
Although he tried to keep his discovery a secret, the news spread quickly and led to the so-called "California Gold Rush" of 1849.
Thousands came from near and far to make Coloma one of the fastest-growing and prosperous cities in the country.
Areas were staked out, tents were pitched, and saloons and hotels almost sprang up overnight.
Everyone wanted their share of the country's wealth.
For many, it was "Coloma or Bust" (Coloma or Bust)!
In this game, you are a pioneer seeking wealth in the west and trying to make a name for yourself.
You'll search for gold, recruit workers, round up horses and build businesses.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding river courses and adjoining areas.
You are not alone - the other pioneers seem to have the same idea!
You have to beat your pioneering colleagues or you're going to go out of business with the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many paths to victory.
You simultaneously choose your actions, have to manage your resources, and build a tableau that works more and more for you (so-called "engine building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to become more efficient, get additional actions, or apply rules to your advantage.
With these buildings and dynamic bridge tiles, you can develop your individual play style with fine adjustments.
Coloma spans three years from 1848 (the year gold was discovered in Coloma), 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush), and 1850 (the year California gained official statehood).
One year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
During each round, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the game board to perform actions.
After that, their selection is revealed, and they place their pioneers in the appropriate locations.
If a location has the most pioneers, it will be locked!
This deactivates one half of the location - thereby reducing the possible actions there.
Then players take turns performing actions, such as gathering resources, moving wagons, setting up tents, crossing rivers, building bridges, opening stores, and positioning gunfighters.
When all actions are completed, the pioneers return.
The spinner turns to a new location at the beginning of each round, changing the available actions.
This continues until the prompter has moved five times, i.e. covered each location once, and the year ends.
There's a shootout in which players must defend Coloma from an attack by angry bandits.
If the players have contributed enough Revolver Heroes and outnumber the bandits, they get rewards.
However, if they fail, they receive lesser rewards or end up in the graveyard.
The game ends after the third shoot-out, and then the final result is announced.
The player with the most victory points wins!
For free shipping, I will take up to the dimensions of 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm the shipping method, goods shipment (games wrapped in foil).
For everything else, I usually use DPD, with insurance and tracking (the games are wrapped in film, covered with tiles, and packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can send the box in a box for an extra charge of 2 Euros, so that there are no print marks at all.
"Why children are not tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW: psychological violence, sexual abuse, abuse of power
The ARD documentary appeared in my Twitter timeline today, and I watched it right away.
>The child psychiatrist Michael Winterhoff is a frequent guest on talk shows and gives talks across Europe.
With his book "Why Our Children Become Tyrants" (2008), he sparked a heated debate on child-rearing.
Former patients and guardians are now making serious allegations against him.
Please take care of yourselves, the film is hard to watch.
And I am very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
It must never, never, never be about power over the child for us parents and other responsible persons.
Our goal must always be to give the child freedom to develop and to make the framework for the child as large as it is sensible and possible in the situation.
Brrr, it still gives me chills.
Holetschek: Countries are discussing the abolition of the test obligation for those who have been vaccinated three times
The health ministers of the federal states want to decide on a nationwide abolition of the testing requirement for the triple-vaccinated at their next meeting.
"We countries need clarity quickly as to whether and when the testing requirement can be lifted for those who have been vaccinated three times," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the Conference of Ministers of Health, to the "Bild am Sonntag".
The removal of 2G plus for triple-vaccinated people is "not only medically sensible, but also provides an additional incentive to get vaccinated," said Holetschek.
Federal Health Minister Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has agreed, "that he will make a proposal to the Health Ministers' Conference as early as next Tuesday". - afp
So I want to send the lamp back
How should I proceed?
Hi, I think the #PRS_ORG# chair is very nice, but I can't see how high the seat is.
Can you help me?
I can no longer process a purchase through my #PRS_ORG#.
Notice: Oops, an error occurred.
Shopping via the #PRS_ORG# website on a computer works.
I've updated my account details.
What could be the reason for this?
What you describe is called "awareness", i.e. sensory perceptions under general anaesthesia.
These occur with a frequency of about 1 in 1,000.
The most common is hearing sounds/voices, less common is seeing pictures, and the rarest is feeling pain.
Relevant to this topic: Caesarean sections are operations that are associated with a higher rate of awareness, as a very deep anaesthesia is avoided to protect the baby until the placenta is delivered.
Previous episodes of awareness should be mentioned during the pre-anaesthetic discussion.
Certain anaesthetic techniques such as total intravenous anaesthesia (TIVA) carry a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Dear all, this comment of mine describes Awareness correctly, however, u/Nitemarex had by definition none.
I misread her comment.
But the chair is defective.
Unfortunately, the 20 euros will not help us.
These are legal claims for compensation.
At the very least, they should take the broken chair back.
This is standard in the eCommerce sector in addition to the legal requirement.
Please check again to see if they will at least take back the broken chair.
We will then sell the second chair privately.
We also lose a lot of money.
I've already sent you an email that you didn't respond to.
Once again, the question.
The order and the invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The freight forwarder is company #NAME#.
I just called there.
I was told they only deliver to the front door - due to #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If so, I need to cancel the order as I don't know anyone who can carry the heavy furniture up to the first floor.
Then why wouldn't I be called?
I had asked a question
Theatre historian Günther Rühle has died aged 97
He has made a name for himself as a theatre critic and as an artistic director.
Later, he wrote a monumental history of the theater.
On Friday, Günther Rühle died at the age of 97.
The new book lies on the table, freshly printed: "An old man gets older".
The disturbing diary of a slow farewell from the world, which the theatre historian and journalist Günther Rühle kept until April 2021.
And right in the middle of reading comes the news that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book is: "I already testify my gratitude for life here."
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common is the Euro pallet, a standardised wooden pallet used mainly in Europe as a load carrier.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association (EPAL)
According to data from Statistics Austria, over ten million pallets were produced in Austria in 2020.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
The number of pallets imported into Austria each year is not recorded
New York wins the MLS championship for the first time
New York City FC have won the Major League Soccer title for the first time.
After a 1:1 draw in regular time against the host Portland Timbers, the team from the Eastern Conference won the final in the penalty shootout with 4:2.
In the Eastern Conference final, New York had prevailed over Philadelphia Union, the team of German Kai Wagner.
Rouladen tips & tricks
I got a lot of great tips here last week for the perfect goulash.
It was at Christmas time and it was unbelievably delicious and melt-in-your-mouth!
So thanks again for that :)
Now I'm in the mood and want to cook rouladen for the first time on New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow, I will make a beef stock for it.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, just a big pot.
What's next?
What about the books, or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English is not so good, but I can manage
This is about a refund of €#NUMBER#
I was already informed by email on 18.01. that the reimbursement had been made.
But to this day, the money has not reached me.
Please check that.
Where you can still get Christmas roast in the Lübeck area
For many people, goose or duck is as much a part of Christmas as the Christmas tree and the presents.
Haven't you bought any poultry yet?
Now the time is tight.
We'll tell you where you can still get a Christmas roast in the Lübeck area.
The "drive" of a tube power stage contributes significantly to the warmth and fatness of the guitar amplifier sound.
These characteristics are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN, and MASTER VOLUME controls, you can adjust both the desired volume and the amount of distortion in your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amplifiers feature a unique POWER LEVEL control that allows you to reduce the sound level without changing the "gain" or the distortion.
Up above, it was already mentioned that the POWER LEVEL control can be used to make a power reserve available quickly when things get unacceptably loud.
Thanks to the POWER LEVEL controller, the full potential of the VT+ series can be used in every situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line out.
The signal being applied here is processed with a box simulation, so that you even get an "acoustic" sound impression even when using headphones or when recording directly.
A CD or MP3 player can be connected to the AUX port, so you can jam to your favourite songs.
A tuner function is also on board - so you don't need a separate tuning device.
Those who buy a VFS5 foot switch in addition can call up the sounds conveniently by foot, switch the effect blocks on and off, and "tap" the tempo of the effect blocks that are compatible in this regard.
This is actually indispensable for live performances.
With its new power packs, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But I had seen it that way with others.
Is it possible to return the lamp?
Because it hangs too low over a dining table?
So, I would like to send them back.
Can you help me?
And the chest of drawers?
Will we get another update on the exact delivery date in the coming weeks?
Hello, have you ever sat in a #PRS_ORG# chair?
If that doesn't work, I would also be satisfied with a legacy or a voucher.
I might find a buyer for the furniture.
More than 1,000 euros for goods I don't need is a bit too much.
I just received my delivery and would have liked to know if screws were part of the delivery.
I would like to mount the #PRS_ORG# mirror (door) on the designated hook.
That's not a satisfactory answer and the wait has not been worth it
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran Sees Progress in Talks on Nuclear Deal
According to Iranian reports, progress is being made in the talks on reviving the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are on the verge of agreeing on the issues that are to be on the agenda," Iran's chief negotiator, Ali Bagheri, told the IRNA news agency on Sunday.
This is a "positive and important development" because at first there was not even agreement on the issues to be negotiated.
The agreement is intended to prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, the Vienna talks to revive the agreement had been continued after a break of just under a week.
Iranian, German, British, Chinese, French, and Russian negotiators are taking part in the talks.
A US delegation is also present in Vienna, but only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia overtakes Saxony - Free State is now the federal state with the highest COVID-19 infection rate
Thuringia has replaced Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
As the only federal state, the value is above the mark of 1000.
Thuringia was the only federal state to have an incidence rate above 1000 on Sunday.
The Robert Koch Institute gave the seven-day value with 1,025 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants.
In Saxony, which had always shown the highest infection rate in the country, this value was 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia was slightly reduced, but was also above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus and 16 further deaths associated with an infection were reported within one day.
On Sunday, 200 people severely ill with Covid-19 were being treated in hospital intensive care units.
On weekends, there may be delays in registration.
In addition, the health departments have been overburdened for weeks and can hardly keep up with the registration of new cases.
I understand that.
As the delivery is not until early March, it may be possible by then.
I have to print it and stick it on the parcel and take it to the post office, that's it or?
Do I have to click/enter/fill out anything else here?
This is exactly what I want to avoid, which is why I am writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return at my own expense, please.
In my opinion, the 8 euro return fee is a cheek.
It's time for change
###Hello Bundestag, I am u/StratorDE in the plenary hall in the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
#Why is the post here?
If you look at the activity of the Bundestag in the past months, you can come to one conclusion: it does not exist.
We have fallen into a winter slump and extended the summer doldrums to a few months.
#Where is the problem?
Yes, what was the reason?
Mostly it's just down to dissatisfaction with how some things have gone here and how we stand in general.
In recent days, it has become increasingly apparent that many people here still have a real appetite for the Bundestag.
#What we have to change
At this point the community around the Bundestag is asked, which wants to keep it alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who became aware of the project in recent days and found, simply put, a mess.
After some back-and-forth, several people from the community have come together who want to rebuild the project.
However, I would like to call on everyone once again to get involved, only in this way can this project continue to exist in the future.
To this end, we have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server, where we can exchange ideas with each other and work on concrete things.
You can join the server via this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag work in the future?
* Which existing orders need to be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves to the outside world in the future?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How can we create a fair election system?
I'm pretty sure that I've forgotten some things, but that's not a problem; we have the Discord at the end for that.
If you have the time and interest, come to the Discord, work with us, and let's democratically decide the future.
I have ordered a lampshade from you, which is yet to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for that and not suitable for my taste.
I have already ordered a different suspension from you for this.
I put it together and then noticed it when I took the soft foam off.
I'm very sad about it.
I hope this is returned and I get a full refund.
This is also pretty sad, as the #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have another question: does the day blanket #PRS_ORG# also come in a larger size, such as 240/240, for example?
#PRS_ORG# must be able to guarantee me that the faulty wardrobe will be collected promptly.
And I ask you to make that happen now.
I don't have suitable packaging, but I will dismantle the cupboard as far as possible for collection - they must clarify with #PRS_ORG# how this can work.
#PRS_ORG# can contact me by phone at any time to arrange a collection date.
Is there an assembly guide?
How long would I have to get them or decide to return them?
How do you respond to the question of why you're vegan?
Today I had a conversation with a colleague that I like.
She herself once lived for a while as a vegetarian, and now probably eats meat very rarely.
I myself was also a vegetarian for several years.
When asked if I've always wanted to be vegan, and if vegetarianism was a planned stepping stone, I answered honestly without much thought.
And that I thought for a long time that as a vegetarian, I would be supporting animal welfare, but at some point, I reflected and understood that in the end, I was also supporting animal cruelty.
Therefore, my decision to become vegan.
In that moment, I got the impression that there was some discontent on their side; they then defended vegetarianism and said that they know where their meat comes from and that as a vegetarian you reduce animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer was too "plump"?
How does she answer the question?
I feel like as a vegan you're quickly put into a corner and conflict arises, without you wanting it to.
A harmony-loving vegan greets you (;
This is clearly not an exception to § 312d of the German Civil Code.
Your #PRS_ORG# does not exempt you from the legal requirements for distance selling.
I am not at the appointed date #PRS_ORG# is collecting my return.
As I cannot be there due to a funeral, this cannot be changed, unfortunately.
Can I please be assigned an alternative collection date?
From 01.02.#NUMBER#, I will be available continuously again.
Lahnsteiner Wehr prepared for water rescue: 45,000 euro grant from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Minister of the Interior, Roger Lewentz, presented a funding notice in the amount of 45,000 euros for the new water rescue vehicle of the volunteer fire brigade in Lahnstein to the mayor, Peter Labonte.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in use since November 2020, was €135,000.
A good and important investment in security.
I am happy that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us here," says Lahnsteins mayor, Peter Labonte.
The equipment wagon is used by the Lahnstein diving squad, one of a total of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Above and under water, they perform tasks in water and ice rescue as well as technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are dealing with a permanent increase in calls: the boom in hotel shipping on the Rhine and Mosel, as well as the further increase in the use of the Lahn as a recreational river, are contributing to this.
I bought a book that I could only read 10% of and then the problems started.
I can't open the book.
I have followed their advice but synchronised, removed and reloaded the app NOTHING has worked.
I'm a bit frustrated because the whole thing has already cost me a lot of time and now I'm hoping for help.
Okay, that's how it is.
I would like to order 3 items from the #PRS_ORG# collection for June.
Can I enter a date in the ordering process?
According to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 Standard, the values mentioned above were measured in the Fenix laboratory at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% humidity and the built-in 275mAh LiPo battery.
Values may vary depending on the flashlight used, age, and environment.
*: The burn time in the Bright level contains the burn time with reduced brightness due to overheating protection.
2) Retailers are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the retailers or distributors from which they purchased Fenix lights for warranty support with the Fenixlight Limited "Warranty Card" and either a sales invoice or receipt.
Fenix will make the technology and parts available to our authorized dealers that are required for the maintenance of our lights.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix will replace a new product within 15 days after purchase because of possible manufacturing defects, if problems occur during normal use.
We will replace it with the same model.
When a model is discontinued, customers receive a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repair for 5 years: Fenix offers free repair for lamps within 5 years from the date of purchase if a problem occurs during normal use.
Different warranty periods for different products:
Except for the products and accessories listed above, other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product warranty.
3) Limited Lifetime Warranty: For lights that have exceeded the free warranty period for repairs, we offer lifetime repairs but charge for parts.
The dealer will share the cost of the part with the customer before the repair.
4) Guarantee certificate: Customers request after-sales service from Fenix dealers or dealers by presenting a completed Fenix guarantee card, a purchase receipt or a receipt.
The distributor should offer services to the customer, and Fenix will support these services.
5) The free warranty does not cover any damage or failure caused by:
All defects or damage caused by improper handling, including, but not limited to, handling that is not in accordance with the guarantee or instructions in the product specification.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head should not be disassembled, as this may damage the flashlight and void the warranty.
Any defects or damage caused by other behaviors cannot be properly controlled by Fenix.
6) To make a warranty claim, please contact our warranty department with the following information: Name, type/model of warranty item, serial number.
Thanks first of all for putting yourself out there for this, I have also spent almost a decade in public service in a similar capacity, i.e. we were also armed officers in the executive, I won't go into any more detail than that!
I always find the question of right and left to be very simplified.
Basically, one should say that the servant of the state naturally comes from the liberal to conservative spectrum and not from the revolutionary left, which should be clear to everyone.
It should be clear to everyone, of course, that people wearing uniforms and carrying weapons should also be drawn to the right of conservatives. It should also be clear to everyone that these people can of course have a hard time coping with the lived reality. Of course, in addition to the average white person, there are now many Germans with a migration background, women, and also homosexuals (and by that I don't mean the exaggeratedly feminine stereotype of a queer person, because these are rather rare in the executive, but rather normal men and women who you don't notice if they don't tell you about it), and I can and must rely on these people, because in case of doubt, they will save your life or set it aside for you.
But these fringe groups also represent a conservative attitude, according to my experience, meaning that they are proud of Germany and feel less included by exaggerated left-wing politics, even though this politics supposedly advocates for them or thinks it is doing them a favour. They just want to be treated normally.
Back to the right-wing extremists, as the police and armed forces are of course a cross-section of society, you will also find extreme right-wingers there, but that they are allowed to openly express their opinion there or even openly plot any state-endangering plans is completely overblown in the media and also annoys me.
Of course, it happens that police officers and soldiers, who are often deployed abroad, start to generalize and say things that are controversial or even politically incorrect due to negative experiences.
It also happens that right-wing sympathisers meet who engage in a lively exchange of ideas.
Nevertheless, I believe that this kind of thing is well combated and also counteracted with political education and enlightenment!
Germany is so very international and that is a good thing in my opinion that we could not afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, what I don't understand is that I also ordered the other basket on the German side.
Why should it come from England?
When I ordered, it wasn't sold out.
I ordered in November already.
but it was confirmed to me in your order confirmation
It's still about my order that can no longer be delivered.
I was chatting with #NAME# before.
Alternatively, one could have the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# euros in black delivered to Germany or is this basket also available in Germany somewhere.
I can only ever find you as a partner company.
but at the top edge of the wood part there are two deep grooves that have been filled with something yellow
and there is a small scratch on the mirror itself
Regular through child?
Hello, I (w32) have been concerned about one thing for some time.
I am very disciplined and organised at work (I am self-employed, with very little free time), but I have been struggling for as long as I can remember to keep my home permanently clean and tidy.
There are always phases in which everything remains the same, and then, from time to time, it gets to me and I tidy up and clean.
But it's really never "that someone could just drop in for a visit."
My husband is (unfortunately) not better, it bothers me somewhere but mostly, the household simply loses against work and disinclination.
The kitchen is cleaned most regularly as we like to cook.
Now to my question, have you managed to become more organised with a child?
We don't have one yet, but we are working on it, and this question has been on my mind for a long time.
Because I have no incentive for me, it just doesn't bother me that much as long as no visitors come and, for example, there is always fresh clothing and the kitchen is usable.
Do you have a greater incentive with a child, or do you stay sloppy?
Looking forward to your answers.
An exclusive, new, high-quality, and anatomically pre-shaped cut offers maximum comfort, a perfect fit, and thus almost unrestricted freedom of movement.
Pre-shaping with special, further shaping at the joints for improved freedom of movement (in arm and knee bends)
For the Focea Comfort 4, the area covered by the Flex System 2 was more than doubled to further increase comfort.
Seamless stretch panels at the joints reduce friction (armpits, arm and knee bends)
High-quality pre-shaping in the lower back area and in the crotch ensure a close-fitting, perfect fit.
An Elaskin 8.8 stretch panel in the lumbar area increases flexibility around the back zip to improve comfort, especially when bending and mounting or donning equipment on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone around the shoulders and on the back ensures increased flexibility in movements of the arms and back.
Fireskin is a warming, water-repellent material with a special surface structure that provides a high degree of cold protection.
Placed on the chest, it brings warmth to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) seal around the face on the hood increases comfort, seal and durability (separate head hood)
Soft, collar-based zone improves the seal with a fine-adjusting width adjustment using a flexible, gentle hook-and-loop fastener that does not adhere to the lining or the stitches
Double-zippered arm and ankle cuffs connect a reversible inner cuff with a soft, camouflaged neoprene outer cuff
45° indentation at the end of the inner sleeve for increased elasticity and durability when pulling on.
Long zip at the back of the neck with a Elaskin reinforcement, for an anatomical cut with increased comfort on the overall without a hood
Long G-Lock P back zip (overall without hood) with metal slider and integrated Water Dam System for improved sealing (Beuchat Patent)
Zippers on the arms and legs
Neoprene reinforcements on all ends of the zips to prevent tearing if too much force is applied.
Neoprene panels flush-glued with outer and inner overlap
The edges of the outer cuffs are lined for greater durability
Ribs on the inner cuffs for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to fix the computer in place, especially at deeper dives (the system is compatible with all common wrist computers)
A career in social work - as someone with an insecure personality disorder?
I did a training in software development, and now I've been qualified for about a year.
Unfortunately, I am realizing more and more that this profession is not the right one for me, which is why I have been thinking for a long time about starting over and studying social work.
The problem: I have an avoidant (i.e., anxious-avoidant) personality disorder (APD).
In other words, I have no self-esteem and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people on a professional level, but I find it very difficult to have casual conversations, and I have been told that I come across as unapproachable (which I think has improved).
Can I become a social worker this way?
I don't want to work as a street worker or in a youth club, but rather in, for example, addiction counselling or family support.
But I don't know if the actual working day is really like I imagine it to be, and it's difficult to find anything about it on the Internet.
The ÄVPS is already causing problems in my job (for me, emotionally) because it drags me down every time there is something to complain about in my code ("screwing up the simplest things again") and it's hard for me to ask for help from more experienced colleagues ("I should already know how to do this by now"/"I'm holding him back with my stupid questions"/"he must really think I'm incompetent" etc.).
I'm probably going to have these problems in every job, but I wanted to bring it up here.
But you have got the sofa back?
Because there was no confirmation for that either.
I'm waiting for a date to pick it up
What do they mean by "please return"?
When I try to download a book from #PRS_ORG# I get the message Your #PRS_ORG# does not authorize this book
Is there a problem with that?
I was in chat with #PRS_ORG, who asked me if I'd received delivery confirmation for my wardrobe.
The protein (protein) taken in with the food is broken down in the bird's gastrointestinal tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids) and from these the bird builds up its own body proteins, which it also needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in the nestling and the feather formation in the moulting bird are extremely complex processes and associated with a particularly high burden for the overall organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio must not be administered during breeding, as this could cause disruptions to the hatching process.
After this meandering gift of NEKTON-Bio, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral preparation) should be resumed.
The protein (protein) taken in with the food is broken down in the bird's digestive tract into the individual protein building blocks (amino acids) and, from these, the bird builds up its own body proteins, which it also needs for feather formation.
The formation of feathers in nestlings and the formation of new feathers in moulting birds are extremely complex processes and for the overall organism of the animal are associated with a particularly high level of stress.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio must not be given during breeding, as this can cause disturbances in the hatching process.
After this course of treatment with NEKTON-Bio, the daily vitamin supply with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral preparation) should be resumed.
1 g NEKTON-Bio per 250 ml water or 100 g soft food.
It is only advisable to prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird consumes daily, and to change the water/food daily.
A marked measuring spoon (included) is equivalent to 1 g of NEKTON-Bio.
In the case of severe feather damage, the double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio can be given at the beginning, until the start of feather regrowth is visible.
After that, the normal dose is given until the feather regrowth is fully completed.
Storage: NEKTON-Bio should be stored dry, out of direct sunlight, between 15° and 25°C.
Please excuse me, but the chair is being sold as an office chair.
How can an office chair break after 9 months?
Warranty claims in Germany are for 24 months.
That is really very poor service.
Hi, I sent an email on Monday to let you know my order has arrived damaged with pictures attached.
Did you receive this email?
A statement by a municipal employee contradicting the bylaw
Hello r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have the following problem.
A walnut tree is to be cut down on our property.
So a felling application was submitted to the municipality.
A member of staff writes to me that the felling of fruit trees, and therefore the walnut tree, is not part of the charter.
However, the walnut tree is explicitly listed in the statute as a tree to be protected.
Can I rely on the employee's statement, or not?
On the one hand, I have to be able to rely on an expert opinion.
On the other hand, the statute is clear.
Thank you for your answers
We understand that.
Then, we will use the new packaging for it.
I have not received a message
Well, then I still have a sofa without use.
Can you offer me a discount or a voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I believe so, but the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the blanket delivered to Germany.
Can you check that?
Breaking news: Heavy traffic accident in Selb
Recently, a serious traffic accident occurred on the St 2179 between the Selb-Nord interchange and Plößberg.
As the current press release from the police (14:03 pm) states, a car came into the oncoming traffic while overtaking.
There are injured people.
Ah, okay, I understand.
OK, thanks again for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
First of all, happy Christmas to you!
My Christmas is unfortunately not very good, because my dear head is currently demolishing everything that can be thought of.
Before I go on here ... in short: I need advice and the best from people who know my situation somehow - i.e. from you.
I'm currently doing the Ref course as a lateral entrant.
I originally studied something else and worked in that field as well (in order to remain somewhat anonymous, I won't mention anything more specific here).
However, it was all too boring for me, and I started to look for alternatives that would be more fun for me.
At some point, I ended up in teaching and was sure that this is it - even though the framework conditions are much less flexible than in my previous job, but I didn't care.
I'm now at the third "I Google other job ads" stage.
And it's only been half a year.
With the Malen beforehand, I always decided to keep going and at least end the Ref, afterwards I can still change my mind.
But right now I'm absolutely exhausted.
I've had so little free time in the last month, I'm completely run down.
Now it's the holidays, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the ref, I always thought I was stress-resistant, but there my weekend was also my weekend and my evening off was my evening off.
Then I was free.
And the stress at work was irrelevant in those moments.
Now, even family gatherings are too much stress for me.
And then there are these rigid structures that really get on my nerves.
Basically, it's fun and from an outside perspective, the refereeing is also going well, in terms of feedback and so on.
But I am completely exhausted and wondering how much stress my body can take before it completely shuts down - if it isn't already.
I wonder if I want to have the rest of my working life like this - especially if I read some of your posts here - or if I should go back to my old area, where I was valued, I could take time off when I needed it, and although I found the work a bit boring, it was paid adequately, and I worked in a team and not as a lone fighter like it is most of the time now.
But then I wonder if a year from now I'm not back at the same place as I am now and I'm unhappy.
You can tell, it's all a bit of a mess, but perhaps you, as an outsider, have some advice or ideas on how to get out of this situation, where I am completely done and start crying at the slightest thought of it.
I'm not going to make any decisions right now emotionally, that probably won't lead to anything good.
But maybe your views will help me to see at least a little light at the end of the tunnel - or enjoy Christmas, which is enough for me for now.
Thanks for reading, and sorry for the whiny undertone.
I hope that my situation is at least somewhat clear now.
Since its introduction in 2001, VOX's Valvetronix series has continued to evolve, including the combination of advanced modelling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit, which perfectly recreates the behaviour of a tube amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we are presenting a brand-new modelling engine that is absolutely state-of-the-art in terms of sound.
Thanks to the VET (Virtual Element Technology) technology, which is based on the analysis of the components and the amp circuits, the VTX amplifiers wait with an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
Of course, these amps also contain the multi-stage Valvetronix tube pre-amp.
This is partly based on real analogue circuits, because they just do the sound variations and nuances of a valve amplifier better than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuitry, the VTX amplifiers provide a sealed enclosure and a bass reflex system from which the natural resonances just gush forth.
With VOX's "Tone Room" software, you can even correct historical facts on the virtual level, bending and distorting them until the amp and effects sound just the way you've always imagined them.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modelling technology is primarily due to the VOX Valve Reactor technology introduced in 2001.
Of course, it has since been refined several times in order to meet new sound requirements, which in 2010 once again resulted in a performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series - with more dynamics as well as numerous and significantly improved amplifier models.
From the handy VT20+ to the VT120+ with two speakers, the new VT+ Valvetronix series has also been designed so that all guitarists searching for maximum sound variety will find what they are looking for.
All guitarists dream of the compression and dynamics of a tube amp: they expect a fat sound, nuanced reproduction of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During an in-depth analysis, the VOX engineers discovered that the power stage in particular determines the tube character of an amplifier and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology based on this finding.
Each VT+ amplifier's Valve Reactor circuit, which uses a 12AX7 tube, perfectly models the behavior, subtle nuances, and sound character of a tube amplifier.
NBA: Despite 20 points from Wagner, Magic lose to the Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine - but it's not enough to win against the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven points from his older brother Moritz, the Magic lost 104:106 to the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday.
The large main compartment is also customisable: with three individually placed and fold-away Velcro dividers, it adapts entirely to the needs of your photo equipment and is therefore suitable for all kinds of cameras - from mirrorless system cameras of all sizes to full-frame DSLRs.
What ultimately fits in the backpack depends of course on the size of the camera and the lenses.
A possible loadout would be a DSLR camera with a mounted lens, two to three interchangeable lenses, and a pop-up flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the various Sony a7 models or a Fujifilm X-T2 leave room for additional lenses.
In addition, you can store a lot of accessories.
And who has a small DSLM camera (MFT cameras from Olympus, Fujifilm X-A or E-series) can use the backpack for his equipment and for non-photographic things.
Drone pilots also make an optimal choice with the Everyday Backpack 20L, as the backpack offers sufficient space for a DJI Mavic Pro including remote control and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: probably the longest in history
In the just under three months since the outbreak began, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused great damage.
Is an end in sight?
With a duration of now 85 days, the volcanic eruption on La Palma has been the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Island since Sunday.
Until now, the eruption of the Tehuya volcano in 1585 with 84 days was considered the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on previous eruptions.
Although the activity of the unnamed volcano in the Cumbre Vieja has slightly decreased in recent days, volcanologists have not yet dared to predict when it might end.
Indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," said the president of the island council, Mariano Hernandez Zapata, to the state television station RTVE.
Damage in the millions
In the nearly three months since the outbreak began, the more than 1,000 degree hot lava has destroyed nearly 2,900 homes and other buildings, according to RTVE.
Less than 1200 hectares were covered by a meter-thick layer of lava.
This is almost 1700 football fields.
More than 7,000 residents had to be evacuated and the damage is estimated at more than 900 million euros.
Two new peninsulas were created off the coast by cooled lava, with a combined size of about 50 hectares.
In particular, the banana cultivation, which is immensely important for the island and from which about half of the approximately 85,000 inhabitants live directly or indirectly, was severely affected, and which was already in crisis before the volcanic eruption.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed, other areas were severely affected, wrote the newspaper "El País".
Christmas and the gifts
Christmas is just around the corner and especially the children will hardly be able to wait for the heavenly feast.
The many colorful gifts under the Christmas tree, combined with the spiritual atmosphere and the crackling tension, have something alluring about them.
Christmas is one of the few traditional occasions that still holds our increasingly divided society together.
It is all the more important to be aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the gesture of giving, which, according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss, was a peace-promoting "social contract of nature peoples", can escape the rigid routine and be given new life in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became the Christ Child
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked the Christmas days with the giving of gifts.
Previously, gifts were exchanged on St. Nicholas Day in one way or another.
The background to this still popular custom is that Saint Nicholas, as Bishop of Myra, threw gold into the windows of three women in one night to save them from a life of sin.
This unconventional way of giving gifts gave rise to the popular German custom of filling the boots, especially of children, with gifts.
Protestants found the practice offensive, because they reject the notion of mediators between God and humans as "idolatry."
For these reasons, they are opposed to the institution.
Martin Luther turned St. Nicholas into the Christ Child and thereby founded a new tradition.
With this, the focus of giving has shifted to Christmas Eve.
Since most Protestants do not see such details so closely, it only annoys the fewest that the custom of St. Nicholas is still a fixed part of the pre-Christmas season, much like the custom of St. Martin with St. Martin singing and St. Martin's parade.
Today, you can find everything from socks to coveted luxury watches outside the door and under the Christmas tree.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources indicate a tradition of giving on the day of Saint Nicholas since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving changed to Christmas Eve.
In all Christian countries, however, there is a happy muddle over the question of who brings the gifts to the children.
In Germany, it depends on the region as to whether the Christkind appears on Christmas Eve or the Christmas Man, who is essentially a kind of Saint Nicholas with some characteristics assigned to him over time.
These include his white beard, which has little in common with the more austere Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sleigh pulled by reindeer, and his preference for chimneys to gain access to houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure at Christmas.
In Spain, the Three Wise Men give the presents, while in Italy it is the witch Befana who is said to have shown them the way to the baby Jesus.
In Scandinavia, mythical creatures sometimes bring the gifts, while in Russia Father Frost has brought some fame.
Here it's not reindeer, but three horses that pull his sleigh as a troika.
In the Czech Republic, the homeland of the Reformation in the wake of the Hussite Wars, the Christ Child is responsible for the delivery of gifts.
I have been getting this error message for 3 weeks now when trying to download a new book, my account details and contact details are up to date though:
Please help to fix the error, as I
Otherwise buy another e-book #PRS_ORG#.
I requested a return shipping label for my order #NUMBER# last week and this morning.
I was told one would be sent to me.
As I haven't received one yet (not in the SPAM folder either), I wanted to ask now, how long this usually takes.
Thank you very much.
Police shoot alleged bank robber near King's palace
On Saturday, a man armed with a knife was shot dead by the police near Kensington Palace in London.
Police said callers reported a man had gone into a bank and a bookmaker's shop with a gun.
The man fled in a vehicle, according to authorities, which was later stopped by officers.
Shots were fired and the man was hit.
He was pronounced dead at the scene.
The police did not suspect a terrorist background.
Several embassies are located in the area around Kensington Palace.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Catherine and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
which ones?
No matter where I click, I am immediately redirected to your page.
The decorative light fits harmoniously into every bed, garden area or rock garden.
The lamp is simply set up and can be anchored in the ground with 2 ground spikes.
Integrated and powerful 0.4 watt solar module for optimal charging of the built-in battery.
Maximum light duration: 10 hours.
- The robust plastic finish is suitable for year-round outdoor use.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is mostly threatening objects from distant galaxies that light up internally in colour.
Smart Stone, on the other hand, is completely harmless: The sun alone ensures that this solar light shines fascinatingly – optionally in white or coloured light (in six different colour tones).
The borderless, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: Like a naturally formed large pebble, this modern light object presents itself during the day.
Its organic curves fit into any natural environment - whether on the edge of the terrace, in the lawn or in the stone bed.
It also does well in the company of larger pebbles and boulders, where it can hold its own thanks to its size.
You can save yourself a lot of work: As a solar lamp, "Smart Stone" does not require a power supply or batteries.
Place the "beacon" in any sunny place during the day.
Two supplied earth spikes provide a firm hold if necessary.
The matt white plastic shell itself is robust and weatherproof.
His solar panel discreetly hides "Smart Stone" inside, along with his battery and two LEDs - one for white, the other for colored light.
The battery is already being charged when sunlight falls on the case.
When it gets dark, "Smart Stone" starts to light up on its own; the colour is up to you: In addition to daylight white, there are six attractive light colours to choose from.
It also switches off automatically once the battery charge level has fallen to a pre-set minimum or it gets light again.
As soon as the sun shines again, the charging cycle starts all over again the next day.
I've done this multiple times and it doesn't work.
That's a shame, I would have liked to have continued ordering from you, but if the voucher is not credited to me, then I will not order from you out of principle.
If you change your mind, let me know.
Otherwise, that was then the last contact today.
Then please send me the number for the sideboard.
During the lockdown, no hardware store was open anyway...
The motor control of the LokSound 5 has been fundamentally improved once again.
A variable PWM frequency of 10kHz to 50kHz makes for a super quiet operation - the typical "humming" is a thing of the past.
The load regulation can now be adapted to difficult cases with up to 10 CVs.
The unique "Autotune" function allows the decoder to be automatically tuned to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder delivers up to 1.5A of motor current, so it has enough juice even for older motors.
- Please use the eBay shopping cart to ensure shipping costs are combined correctly.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number.
- You will receive an invoice from the specialist retailer showing the VAT for every purchase of new goods.
- We usually process your order or request within 24 hours on business days.
The pill problem
Hello ladies,
I hope I'm doing this right, this is actually my first post after a year on reddit.
My problem: About five years ago, I was forced to start taking the pill again, mostly because I was having such incredibly bad pain during my period and terrible PMS before my period.
Now, I would like to keep it that way, because I already have to take enough medication due to chronic conditions, which I cannot choose myself.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I had gone from 0 to 100 with an explosion of pimples during my last two-year break and they were all over the place.
So far so superficial, but it really got to me and I didn't feel comfortable.
In the two-year break, things have never really normalised.
Maybe someone has some tips on how to avoid this time.
My cosmetics are already fragrance-free and without any frills, but maybe there is something that someone can recommend to me.
The gynaecologist did not take me seriously, and I still have to make an appointment with the dermatologist.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the novel!
Yes, the dear skin is such a thing.
Had severe atopic dermatitis as a child, then a time of rest, then large-scale nodular lichen and the acne problem.
I've also tried all sorts of things in the course of my chronic illness, and I've ended up on a sugar-free, milk-free and meat-free mixed diet, because nothing else has worked very well.
It could also well be that hormonally it is just the worm inside, but if you, like me, have a building site everywhere, you just don't want to look for anything else that's going wrong.
I already had everything from her colleague, semina, etc.
Written and now I've lost the conversation and don't know what was said in response to my request.
I have to work in between and answer the phone and suddenly everything was gone...
what is there to check, if the money was there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong
but does it exist at all in large
as it is widely available in black
The Zappiti 4K HDR series - The best movie experience ever!
Zappiti designs and produces high-end video management systems; for the best image quality, excellent performance and the best possible user-friendliness.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you comfortable and intuitive access to your entire movie library in breathtaking 4K High Definition resolution.
The award-winning Zappiti Player is successfully used worldwide to enhance the movie experience, both at home and in commercial settings.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats, including the latest 4K HDR standards like Dolby Vision and HDR10+, virtually all current video file formats, full BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with a billion colors (10-bit color encoding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio files like DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and has a wide, solid case, two HDMI outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS:X for the best possible home cinema experience.
The combination of the Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 video processing offers outstanding image quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamics, precise colour representation, increased contrast, solid de-interlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p TV or a front projector, you'll be blown away by the picture quality of your display!
3D also offers a better sense of depth and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not designed for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or an AirMouse (not included).
Network Playback: Special network optimization that, thanks to the SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files), guarantees better performance for playback over the local network via Gigabit Ethernet or 10/100 Ethernet, regardless of the type of media.
Universal RC: Seamless integration into smart home installations through ready-to-use Control4 drivers, RTI drivers, Elan drivers, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It's not much help as I've been waiting since September.
Now, nothing works.
My account is apparently locked and the language is English
Also compatible with all printers that use the above products according to the manufacturer or user manual.
Over 10 years' experience as a specialist dealer in toner production
All listed company and brand names, as well as all mentioned type designations, are the property of their respective legal manufacturers and rights holders.
Their mention serves merely as a guide and to indicate the compatibility of the goods.
They are not original products of the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
What vouchers???
I didn't get my voucher credited on my last order!
In the name of the people: Lay people pass judgement
In court, they sit on the judge's bench in everyday clothing.
But their verdict is important, even if they do not wear a robe: Jurors decide, together with professional judges, whether and for how long someone is sent to prison.
Two of them report on their time at the Bad Kreuznach Regional Court in an interview with the "Oeffentlichen": Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of the 125 lay judges at the Regional Court on John-F.-Kennedy-Straße.
Hello, unfortunately I can't get into my customer account.
Could you please send me the invoice for the order number #NUMBER# again to the above-mentioned e-mail address?
Can we get rid of the packaging material?
We have no way to keep them that long.
We would use the table as they offered, as if it were ours.
Yes, I had already ordered the same chair in blue in November and also received it. I would therefore like to have one in grey because they are so beautiful.
Does the wardrobe need to be completely dismantled for collection and return?
and when would it be picked up?
110 kV underground cable to be rebuilt in 2022
The approval for the relocation of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is legally binding.
The plan approval decision of the government of Lower Bavaria paves the way for construction, which is scheduled to begin in 2022.
This was now announced by the network operator Bayernwerk.
The roughly seven kilometre long underground cable will connect the transformer station in Tann in the north of the municipality and the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable will be attached to a pylon of the high-voltage line near the town of Edermanning near Reut.
Good morning,
My order on 03.01.21 with the order number #NUMBER# has only arrived in part.
The blue Betsell number #PRS_ORG# with the delivery number #NUMBER# was returned by #PRS_ORG# with the note "Delivery not possible".
The other three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what will happen next?
Have a great start to the week!
You can forget that, I explained it to you several times yesterday!!
This is a glass dresser and all the sides have burst, so there is glass everywhere and the box is broken
The chest of drawers is in my apartment and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come to my apartment because of the #PRS_ORG# regulations
This means the chest of drawers cannot be collected because no-one is allowed into my home
Thank you for the message
but why only 20 euros?
The original value of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it's with all books, that's why the request to #PRS_ORG#, as it seems to be a general problem.
Ref: Planning lessons (EK)
Hello dear colleagues,
I've been in the Ref since summer, teaching is fun, but I'm currently having big problems planning my geography lessons in an efficient way.
Unfortunately my school is not technically well equipped at all, so in principle I can only use the blackboard, the school book and an OHP as media.
In school, I can only copy s/w for free (which is annoying for geography).
Currently, I need a very long time to plan my hours.
For example, we are currently working on the topic of geofactors and in my case, each hour stands on its own.
In principle, the methods are always repeated, but on the other hand, I don't want to invest too much time in simple lessons (I also need it for UBs, etc.).
I usually start my planning from the learning objective (what do I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build it up (I usually create a worksheet with texts from books that my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra and with most of the tasks in the book I'm rather dissatisfied.
Therefore also the worksheets.
Maybe a geography teacher can tell me how to work efficiently with the book.
I'd really like that.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from order #NUMBER#.
I have actually already chosen a new one at #PRS_ORG#, but I would like to process the return as quickly as possible.
The trade is worried about the Christmas business because of the 2G regulation.
Only those who have been vaccinated or have recovered may enter most shops.
The trade thinks this is unnecessary and complains of sales declines.
He also has a possible solution at the ready.
From the point of view of Handelsverband Deutschland (HDE), the 2G regulations are ruining the important Christmas business for the retail sector.
Turnover has fallen at businesses selling non-essential items, criticised HDE chief executive Stefan Genth.
According to a recent survey of 1,100 retailers by the HDE, more than 70 percent of businesses have a negative outlook for the rest of the year.
Many have already written off the Christmas business.
"What should have been the positive highlight of the year is now often a bottomless pit," said Genth.
Dealers with 2G access restrictions lost around a third of their pre-crisis sales in the past week.
It's only going well in the food retail sector and in the online sector.
The association called for consequences from the dramatic development.
Shopping with a mask, distance and hygiene concept is a safe thing to do, said the chief executive.
"2G when shopping does not bring us any further in the fight against the pandemic," he stressed.
The current regulations deterred customers and required a lot of staff.
He called for nationwide approval of the band system.
Afterwards, each customer would only have to be checked once for 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and have access to all shops with the wristband they received on that day.
Furthermore, in retail - as in public transport with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested) - random checks should be sufficient.
The real estate group Deutsche Euroshop, which specialises in shopping centres, also spoke of a difficult Christmas business.
The frequencies were recently at around 75 percent of the pre-Corona level without 2G, and the sales at around 90 percent.
These figures will now certainly fall in the middle of the so important Christmas business," said CEO Wilhelm Wellner to "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative effort, attempts are being made to find solutions and to obtain approval for the centers.
This includes the so-called wristband solution, in which "the visitors, for example, present their 2G proof at a central place in the center and then - equipped with a wristband similar to that in a club hotel - can enter all shops undisturbed". dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#.
The mirror has a scratch and the frame also has a fault, which has been attempted to be covered up with a yellow filler.
It looks ugly.
I would like to return the mirror and have already put it back in the package and taped it up.
How do I proceed with the return now?
The lamp is designed for Dual-Balance, based on new, flat, high-power, high CRI SMD LEDs.
A modern microprocessor controls the colour temperature and brightness of the lamp with extraordinary capabilities.
In addition to adjusting the brightness, there are two standard color temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to manually set and save the colour temperature in the range of 3100 - 5650K.
Use the current settings in Flash memory.
A special feature of the controller, it is easy and intuitive to use.
The light produces a very high lumen output of soft, high quality light, completely flicker-free.
The 120 degree beam angle is excellent for being able to light up large areas from a relatively short distance.
By the way, also in reporter situations in small rooms or at short distances.
They can adjust the brightness practically without changing the color temperature.
It's a great tool to work with both on set and in the studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the light in television studios or when the light is mounted in hard-to-reach places.
At the back of the light is the control panel, which consists of buttons and a backlit display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current color temperature in Kelvin.
In addition, there is a slot for NP-F batteries (not included)
User memory The memory has up to three panel settings for brightness and color temperature.
To set the individual settings on the memory slots, simply hold down one of the memory buttons for longer and it's done.
The memory controller stores the current state of the lamp when it is switched off, so that when it is switched on again, the known situation is restored - very practical in studio work when, for example, the camera is set to a specific colour temperature.
Working with a battery one of the biggest strengths of the DL3120 functionality comes from the ability to operate with cheap NP-F batteries.
These are often already owned by photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can tap into existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check before setting if the batteries have enough power - it has a built-in battery tester - for each of the two battery compartments a value in the two display screens (the left battery on the upper display, the right on the lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to continuously supply the headlight with power via the included power supply.
The construction of the headlight is very simple.
They have a 16mm sleeve for mounting, so you can attach them directly to your photography tripod.
The tilt is adjusted reliably by means of stops on both sides.
Care was taken to ensure that the mechanical components are also of an extremely high quality, and are therefore designed for long life and hard use.
In addition, a tilt joint is included.
It's great that it also comes with a bag.
This way, you can safely transport or store the lamp with all the accessories you may still want to buy.
Too bad, I got it as a gift and it's too small :(
"The party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrates after a goal-rich comeback against Leverkusen
What a spectacular response from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the Hessen, who had lost twice in a row, were apparently on their way to their next Bundesliga defeat.
But then the SGE turned things around, shot their frustration over a lacklustre start to the season out of their system within a good hour and won 5:2. "It's crazy what the boys have done today," said coach Oliver Glasner at DAZN and spoke a "general praise, to every individual who was involved".
Initially, it looked like another setback for the now in ninth place Frankfurter, who are still behind their expectations.
Patrik Schick had put the Leverkuseners in the lead with 2:0.
What then happened also impressed the SGE trainer.
"How the players then came back and showed a fantastic performance," continued Glasner.
I'm insanely happy with the performance we've shown and, of course, with the result.
Even defender Christopher Lenz, who was standing on the field for the first time since the fourth game day and his overcome muscle injury, stressed the morale of his teammates.
"I think our mentality is incredible," said the 27-year-old, who was particularly pleased for the fans with a look at the result.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
For the upcoming tasks, however, Glasner now wants to keep the focus on himself, but is also well-positioned in terms of the personnel situation.
It's unusual that we have all players fit in December, that all players are physically in top shape.
It's top-class work in our medical department, but the players also live a very professional lifestyle.
Now, one wanted to "go step by step and stay humble" and carry out the tasks until the end of the year "at this level".
Next, there's an away game at Borussia Mönchengladbach on Wednesday as part of the English week (6.30 p.m., Sky).
I just got an email saying that my package is coming back to you because of an error on my part.
I have tried to call #PRS_ORG# and have it diverted, no chance.
Can it be sent directly to me again or do I have to wait until the money is transferred back and place the order again?
This would unfortunately mean that I would not order again, because it has already taken a very long time.
Have you ever sat in a #PRS_ORG# chair?
Dampener for handball women ahead of quarter-final against Spain
Germany's women's handball team slunk off the court after the humiliation against Denmark with their heads down and their eyes empty.
At the end of the World Cup main round, the DHB selection suffered a heavy defeat of 16:32 (8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers and must now face host Spain in the quarter-finals.
"We were far too timid and had too much respect for the opponent," said national coach Henk Groener.
We have to play differently against Spain.
After the first defeat in the tournament, Germany closed the main round group III with 8:2 points in second place behind the Danes (10:0).
It's a shame that we couldn't take the flow with us.
This was a bad game for all of us that we have to get rid of," said captain Emily Bölk.
In the battle to make it into the semi-finals, a significant improvement is needed against the 2019 World Cup runners-up on Tuesday, in order to keep the delicate dream of the first medal since 2007 alive.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was backcourt player Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We just weren't there - neither in attack, nor in defence," admitted backcourt player Xenia Smits and called for: "We have to look ahead now."
Not up to scratch from start to finish
Unlike in the previous five tournament games, the German team was not on the same level at the start of the game.
Missed shots and technical errors in the attack and gaps in the defence were responsible for the quick 0:4 deficit after seven minutes.
Only goalkeeper Dinah Eckerle was immediately on operating temperature and prevented worse with some saves.
The first goal was scored by the DHB team after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a quick counterattack.
This was not, however, the hoped-for spark.
Against the aggressive defence of the Danish women, the German women could hardly set themselves in the scene - and if they did, they mostly failed against the strong Althea Reinhardt in the goal of the Scandinavian women.
So the game was over early at 3:10 after 20 minutes, since backcourt player Mia Zschocke was sent off for a hard foul on her opponent a little later.
In the quarter-final, however, she is allowed to participate again.
It was only in the final phase of the first half that the DHB selection came into the game a little better and at least reached five goals by the break.
The faint hope of a comeback after the change was already gone after seven minutes at 9:19.
Once again, Groener's charges sinned in all areas and made it easy for the well-prepared opponent, who is one of the medal candidates at the final round.
As a result, the German team was unable to build on their performance and left the floor as a clear loser.
DACH Advent calendar Day 6: Family traditions at Christmas time
As part of the Reddit advent calendar we've snagged St. Nicholas Day and are using it as an excuse to talk about family traditions during the pre-Christmas period, Advent, St. Nicholas Day, Christmas Eve, and the Christmas holidays.
What was it like at home for you back then?
How's your\*partner's?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What is the best thing for the children?
Polishing the boots?
Baking cookies?
Decorating a tree?
Is there music?
Is it Santa Claus, the Christ child or is the gift from Grandma and Grandpa?
No matter how you do it, everyone makes an effort to make it as nice as possible as a family around Christmas.
Whether it's a fixed tradition, or even something different every year: tell us how it goes in your family!
Please send me any transaction numbers...or anything that might help
Confirmation of transfer... etc
I would like to give a gift code
like with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
What is it like for them?
The title is there, I work as a vaccination doctor in mobile vaccination teams, where (so far only) the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine is mainly administered in nursing homes.
Since these are almost finished, I will go to a vaccination centre next.
I am happy to answer questions without time limit on the organisational and human aspects and also medical questions, as long as they are not personal (e.g. "I am taking medication X, is it compatible with the vaccination...").
In my area of responsibility comes the information about the vaccination, the indication (the person is entitled to a vaccination according to the Corona vaccination ordinance and has no reasons that speak against it), the medical documentation and, if necessary, emergency care for allergic reactions (this has never happened to me yet).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, e.g. healthcare assistants.
In the vaccination teams, however, we often do not have them, but only (for God's sake, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical-technical assistants for the preparation of the vaccine, who, however, cannot carry out vaccinations (are allowed to?) so that I also carry out most of the vaccinations myself there.
Serious "Huidlerer" question: Amberger knows the answer
What on earth is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent in by an Amberger, the BR television programme "Wir in Bayern" has caused a lot of thought.
However, unlike on many of the preceding days, the term remained beyond the reach of the callers in the "Host mi?" series.
No, it wasn't a "man who is nervous."
And no one "who has to get everything done quickly".
This, people heard from the TV presenter, was completely wrong.
For which the man from Amberg gave the solution and probably also caused astonishment among many people from the Upper Palatinate.
"Der Huidlerer," the audience learned, "is a rag with which someone wipes the oven."
Dialect researcher Antony Rowley, who has been questioned as an expert by Bavarian television for years, confirmed this.
With the note that this is a typical Upper Palatinate term, derived from the more well-known dialect word "Houdern".
With which an educational gap was closed - also for many who have been living in the Amberg region for a long time.
I haven't been able to buy books for two weeks.
After confirmation, the following error message always appears: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have reset the #PRS_ORG# g#PRS_ORG#n, connected it to the PC, synced and repaired it.
Nothing helped.
Tyre choice for racing bikes - really that puncture-proof?
This morning I woke up full of energy because I wanted to do at least a little bit of training for my bike tour next week.
Said and done, and I set off on my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40km were also really nice - but then something happened, which lurks in every city center (this time: thank you Krefeld!).
Glass splinters on the track.
Zack, a loud hissing, and my rear tyre definitely didn't want to come along for the rest of the ride.
Since I had no real chance to get a replacement jacket and replacement hose due to the day of the week, I had to turn back in a somewhat bad mood and take the first train home.
It wasn't so bad in terms of mood, maybe it's better if I practice changing the tyre again before the bike tour.
Now I stand before a question and hope that you can help me.
Since I have a relatively long journey over several days ahead of me, I would not like to get this problem again.
Now it wasn't really bad, because the old tyres from the previous owner (a very nice old man, who rode 120km on the day I came to pick up the bike until 14:00!) and he also described them as sub-optimal, because he had been riding on them for several years.
But if I think about the fact that I still have to change a tyre after 80-90km, then I'm really in a bad mood, I think :D
Now I got talking to an older man at the platform, who surprised me by asking me why I didn't have the Marathon Plus tyres; these are supposed to be puncture-proof.
Now, it all sounds very tempting.
But are they really indestructible?
I don't feel like spending 40€/tyre now, only to be disappointed.
I also wonder: I think I have 25x622 on my racing bike at the moment.
They do exist (apparently?) with the Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you generally advise me to use different tyres on a racing bike?
The Schwalbe page seems to recommend the Durano DD over my absolute! Laiewissen?
Thanks in advance for the help and best wishes!
Car crashes into tree: driver fatally injured
The 53-year-old crashed his car into a central reservation on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten for unclear reasons and then ended up on the opposite carriageway, according to the police.
There was a head-on collision with the vehicle of a 27-year-old.
The car of the 53-year-old then crashed into a tree and the man was trapped in the car.
The 27-year-old, as well as his 23-year-old passenger, were seriously injured in the accident and taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes, we have deleted all the books, authorized all the new authors, and loaded new books.
Environmentally friendly: MOTIP DUPLI products are free of health-damaging metals.
The company group is committed to using formulations that do not contain regulated or questionable ingredients without affecting the best possible performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only deliver rest-emptied containers to the recycling.
Take containers with leftovers to the problem waste disposal site.
Labelling: All products from MOTIP DUPLI comply with the current labelling regulations.
The classification, classification, award is carried out in accordance with GHS or CLP 1272/2008/EC in the current valid form.
The safety data sheets comply with REACH 1907/2006/EC, Article 31 and Annex II in their current valid form.
Many DUPLI-COLOR spray paints prevent unauthorised use with spray protection and tamper-proof closure cap.
Please refer to the instructions on the cap or label.
Before use, always read and observe the attention texts carefully!
Will I receive a confirmation by email?
I have already been assured of this three times by your colleagues...how reliable is your information?
When will the transport company contact me?
I've already written, did you not get my SMS?
After the release of our new high-end wideband B 100-6 OHM, it was only a matter of time before our SOLO series would get some new members.
SOLO 15 is the new offspring and looks like the big role models with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, this building proposal includes a custom-designed foot to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no effect on the acoustics and can therefore be adjusted in length according to the circumstances at home.
The SOLO 15 is, due to its principle, very well suited for people for whom the maximum volume plays a rather subordinate role, but who want to reach an exceptionally high sound level.
A 10cm speaker simply isn't able to produce such a high sound pressure level unfiltered.
However, this does not mean that the SOLO 15 sounds weak.
On the contrary, she is impressively mature and for her size, extremely impressive and accurate.
The SOLO 15 was tuned tonally with a slight increase in the high tones.
This is common practice for widebands to optimise the increasingly high frequency bundling.
The SOLO 15 impresses with a very clear and fine sound, precisely tailored to the listening position.
Slightly turned outwards, the high-frequency range can be reduced, making the sound image warmer.
Thanks to the point sound source, the location of the individual components of a piece of music in the optimal stereo triangle is razor-sharp and surprisingly precise.
The reference-worthy extremely low mechanical losses of the B 100 - 6 OHM result in dynamics that are hard to match.
The SOLO 15 not only complements our SOLO series, but expands it in terms of resolution and accuracy.
As with all of our kits, it's a good idea to think about the final look of the speaker at the start of the build, so that any changes can be planned for.
For example, if you want to veneer the case, the lowering of the loudspeaker must be adjusted accordingly, because the veneer adds material.
After all the plates have been cut to size (e.g. at the DIY store), one should first drill an 8 mm hole in the base plate at the corresponding place in order to be able to easily run the cable there later.
With the help of a router, the speaker opening in the front is now made, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can later be installed flush.
The back of this opening should be chamfered at 45° to make the opening area of the speaker chassis as large as possible on the inside.
The four connection points of the B 100 - 6 OHM are interrupted in the phase, as shown in the image "Detail Phase".
After that, you start with the actual assembly of the box and place one of the two side walls on a flat surface in front of you.
The back, the lid, the front and the bottom are now glued on.
The three stiffeners should also be used and glued.
The stiffeners themselves can vary in material thickness as needed, depending on whether you want to use ready-made mouldings from the hardware store, for example, instead of making them yourself from 16 mm MDF.
In the next step, the second side is attached.
Afterwards, all the plates of the foot follow, i.e. the two sides, as well as the front.
A suitable hole saw or Forstner drill bit makes it easier to attach the holes for the bass reflex tube, as well as the connection terminal on the back panel.
Afterwards, one uses a round cutter to round off all of the edges of the actual box.
The upper side of the foot plate can also be rounded off with it.
Afterwards, the base plate is firmly glued to the base of the case and additionally screwed on with long wood screws.
The next step is to mark and pre-drill (2.5mm drill bit) the fastening points of the speaker chassis and the connection clamp.
After the case has been cleaned of wood dust (vacuuming/blowing), the cable is laid.
The easiest way to do this is through the 35 mm bass reflex opening in the rear wall.
To do this, you push the entire and uncut cable, piece by piece, through the 8 mm hole in the foot until it reaches the terminal opening, and let it stick out about 30 cm there.
At the top of the case, the cable is led to the speaker opening and left there to hang loosely as well.
Next, the frequency changer is prepared and installed.
The construction plan for the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan, can be found in the following document: Assembly instructions for the Solo 15 switch.
Once the frequency changer is installed and the connection terminal is screwed in, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box, which is not yet completely closed, follows.
With the 35mm bASSREFLEX opening and some skill, you can drop hot glue onto the opening and seal it.
By opening the B 100 - 6 OHM and using a small lamp, you can check the seal accordingly.
Now, according to the description, comes the eradication.
Afterwards, the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and fastened with the appropriate screws.
Polarity plays an important role here, so the positive lead (marked cable) must be soldered to the positive pole of the speaker (larger contact).
At the end, the bass reflex tube is cut to the specified length of 28 mm (total length of the tube) and inserted.
To combat this, a mat of the damping material is cut in two and loosely distributed in the case.
The opening around the bass reflex channel should be kept clear.
Can I place an order now and have it delivered in early June?
> Hi everyone,
> Finally, we can announce that we will also be holding the OSCAST this year!
> Unfortunately, for well-known reasons, it's not possible for us to get more than four people into the studio, which means there's more planning involved, and explains the short notice of the announcement.
BUT: We'll have at least three people on the switch so we'll be streaming the Oscars 2021 with at least 7 beans and hopefully thousands of you!
> We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic - but we're going to do our best to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
> It will start around 0:30.
Chill some drinks, plan some good food, and get ready for a long, but very interesting night.
